Mystery, intelligence, charity in Techno-spiritual existence 
  
Who are we, and why are we here? When in crisis, we must ask such questions of principle in existence and philosophy. They concern science, religion, and all of us. The daily and life-long how and why of our being, based in our (more or less reflected upon) idea of existence or belonging, mediates all livelihoods and civilization. The outer contradictions of climate change, technological disruption, and nuclear threat, for example, and the inner contradictions of the pain, anxiety, and grief we feel in our hearts and bodies, are a collective crisis that presses the perennial questions of principle. Here is a thread of principle through mystery, intelligence, and charity.  
  
There are, especially, two sources that re-frame our usual view of Western philosophy and religion: one is a philosophy of knowledge (epistemology), of experience (phenomenology), and of science that has profound implications for our world view (to become spiritual), and the other are scriptures of early Christianity which concern knowledge from a religious view. The latter is a collection of texts which, "invite us to reconsider the nature of our religious and philosophical heritage, the development of Christianity and the Judeo-Christian-Islmaic tradition, and the enduring questions raised by religious and philosophical inquiry" (Marvin Meyer and Elaine Pagels, The Nag Hammadi Scriptures). I will weave through "The Theory of Knowledge Implicit in Goethe's World Conception" concerning the task and possible limits of science, early Christianity and Buddhism in further concern of truth and knowledge, and then address discourses concerning intelligence (Nick Bostrom's 'Superintelligence') and charity (William MacAskill's 'Doing Good Better'; Effective Altruism). The direction of thought here will be toward something like that all beings and fields of endeavor (such as science, economy, or technology) must orient righteously to what is sacred and transcendent in order to live in truth, peace, and harmony; ignorance or unbelief of the sacred is death and dis-ease, whereas sacred knowledge is life. I invite the reader to be brave and patient in reading and contemplating all this - if at first something is not clear, continue reading please. I hope to address a rationalist audience, not only who is spiritual. 
  
What is mystery? Let us put it in terms of what is complete or else incomplete. 
If Nothing (no-thing) is not Something (some-thing), then Something coming from Nothing is incomplete, a mystery unaccounted for since we must ask 'How?' did Something come from Nothing. Nothing, by itself, is complete as an empty unity (completely empty). Something (that is not Nothing) in itself, with a number of parts or various quality, must be self-connected or relational being -- is it incomplete or complete? If complete, then by its self-connected or relational aspect, complete are the parts or relations -- the part has the whole (or the quality of the whole) and the whole has the part. If a part mirrors the whole, it is like a self-similar fractal, nested or recursive being, self-contained or self-generated, infinite; yet it must still be self-connected being. Imagine, not the absolute mystery of how Something comes from Nothing or Nothing comes from Something, but the infinite approach between the two polarities in both quantity and quality, as if to avoid actually crossing the gap between Nothing and Something. Or likewise infinite approach between the poles of One-ness and Two-ness, as archetypal self-differentiation. The Nothing and One-ness poles are necessary to factor in completeness, unity, or self-containment, whereas the other pole of Something and Two-ness are necessary to consider parts, or differentiation. In order to avoid an incomplete supposition, we must relate the polarities themselves as both infinite and self-connected. The reciprocality thus in the poles, is a middle path, a center of being that mediates the connection (unity) of an infinite (differentiating) process. This is a preliminary thought exercise to consider mystery abstractly. Could we fit the idea of love or faith here?  
  
What is certain? It is written, "My people are destroyed for lack of knowledge" (Hosea 4:6). Knowledge is needed to answer our questions. There is a wonderful historical precedent in Western philosophy that will lend us profound implications. It is "The Theory of Knowledge Implicit in Goethe's World Conception" by Rudolf Steiner, in which we understand that knowledge must have a completeness where the activity of knowing is like "higher nature within nature". If we exist and can know anything, then we must know ourselves as higher nature within nature. The idea of completeness or all-encompassing related-ness is ancient. 
  
"That art Thou. Thou art That," is a great pronouncement in the ancient Sanskrit texts of the Upanishads, and is also in the perennial philosophy. It means in other words, an equivalence or connection between what appears separate externally and what appears as Self -- there is no total boundary of separation between what seems to be observer and grasped object; what I see when looking at a tree (That) has my own nature (Thou), and my own nature (Thou) has something of the tree (That). In a science with objects of observation, this has been and must be a concern. But it is not at all only to do with running double-blind control or randomized trials. There are truly profound implications of this principle called Non-duality. With religion, it is in the very word, in Latin 're-ligio' that means to re-join, connect in the unity that is forever, eternal, transcendent, or beyond and yet immediate. The bridge of Nonduality between science and religion is what Steiner can offer us, equally in answering what is knowledge. After this, we'll connect and broaden to the idea of knowledge in a religious view. 
  
Now we shall look at Steiner's "Theory of Knowledge...". We must bravely close off our contemporary and personal concepts, interests, and language, to enter openly into and appreciate this text which first appeared in German in 1886, before we can judge it. 'Experience' in our language, for example, means often what is already in our personal world of meaning and significance, i.e. "That's my experience; that's my individual world", but here it refers to a threshold which is the border of our world of significance, within which things have some relation, and outside of which there is totally no relation. It is the gap threshold which is mysterious because we have the question, like Something from Nothing, of how Something comes into relation as known out of No relation as known. This is also, by the way, the point of divergence between views of 'relativism' and 'objectivism' in philosophy. Let's hear, with patience please, and I will add clarifications to Rudolf Steiner's quotes: 
  
Steiner writes in "The Theory of Knowledge...",  
  
"This is precisely our argument, that an endless number of particulars is what experience offers us. These particulars must of course differ from one another; otherwise they would not in fact confront us as an endless, disconnected manifoldness."  
  
"It is not at all a question of perceived things being undifferentiated, but rather of their complete unrelatedness, and of the absolute insignificance of the individual sense-perceptible facts for the totality of our picture of reality."
  
"If we were confronted by a self-contained, harmoniously organized unity, we could not then say, in fact, that the individual parts of this unity are of no significance to one another."
  
"At this level of contemplation, the world is a completely smooth surface for us with respect to thought. No part of this surface rises above another; none manifests any kind of conceptual difference from another. It is only when the spark of thought strikes into this surface that heights and depths appear, that one thing appears to stand out more or less than another, that everything takes form in a definite way, that threads weave from one configuration to another, that everything becomes a harmony complete within itself." 
  
For something to have significance, it must be in connection or relation. If we would suppose an incomplete principle, which could imply the birth of what is most objective that mysteriously streams into our existence independent of our being across the absolute gap of unrelated into relatedness, then we are really into unsatisfactory metaphysics; it begs the question, 'Where does it comes from, that objective fact?'. If we want a satisfactory and complete principle, then instead of assuming a fact really crosses the gap (or is totally unrelated before becoming related), every thing to be known must be already within our relation or connection, minimally sprung into our experience -- recall Non-duality -- and come to greater completeness for us as knowers, in the thinking activity of knowing as an harmonious unity. Instead of knowing that crosses the mystery - coming from ignorance into knowledge, it is rather a certain harmonious organisation of what is already in the same sphere. In religious correlates, and from Nonduality: it is knowledge that comes from knowledge, not ignorance that comes from knowledge; it is ignorance that comes from ignorance, not knowledge that comes from ignorance. What has a beginning in perishable nature has an end in perishable nature; what has imperishable nature has neither beginning nor end. The truth of eternity is the eternity of truth. What begins incomplete ends as incomplete; what is complete is always complete. 
   
Steiner goes on about experience, 
  
"Pure experience is the form of reality in which reality appears to us when we confront it to the complete exclusion of what we ourselves bring to it." 
  
"The words Goethe used in his essay Nature are applicable to this form of reality: "We are surrounded and embraced by her. She takes us up, unasked and unwarned, into the orbit of her dance." 
  
"With objects of the external sense world, [...] A body confronts us at first as a multiplicity of forms, colours, warmth and light impressions, which are suddenly before us as though sprung from some primal source unknown to us." 
  
When Steiner says of pure experience, 'the complete exclusion of what we ourselves bring to it', he is not really removing the observer, but removing what he considers to be subjective compulsion, whereas there is an objective lawfulness that the thinker has in thinking, as we shall see, which is what bridges the observer and object into the same nature. Later, the place of knowledge we shall extend to mind rather than only thought. 
  
Steiner says further, 
  
"Let us now take a look at pure experience. What does it contain, as it sweeps across our consciousness, without our working upon it in thinking? It is mere juxtaposition in space and succession in time; an aggregate of utterly disconnected particulars. None of the objects that come and go there has anything to do with any other."
  
"A science of knowledge established in the sense of the Goethean world view lays its chief emphasis on the fact that it remains absolutely true to the principle of experience. No one recognized better than Goethe the total validity of this principle. [...] All higher views on nature had to appear to him in no form other than as experience. They had to be "higher nature within nature." 
  
"Goethe says that we are incapable of getting outside nature. If we therefore wish to explain nature to ourselves in his sense, we must find the means of doing so within nature." 
  
"The fundamental error of modern science is that it regards sense perceptions as something already complete and finished. It therefore sets itself the task of simply photographing this existence complete in itself."  
  
"In the true sense of the word this requirement would be satisfied only by a science that simply enumerates and describes things as they exist side by side in space, and events as they succeed each other in time."
  
"We would have to renounce our thinking entirely if we wanted to keep to pure experience. One disparages thinking if one takes away from it the possibility of perceiving in itself entities inaccessible to the senses." 
  
"The sense world must approach such a being from one side, and the ideal essential being of the sense world from the other, and such a being must, in its own activity, unite these two factors of reality." 
  
Thinking is complete in the way that it is given to itself. The sense-world in (our) experience, is not totally given to our thinking -- it is incomplete for us and we do not have its complete and essential being but only one side of its being. This is to fairly acknowledge the mysterious gap (how the sense-world is or is not related to us) while admitting generally non-duality, whereas an error of science is to pretend to 
close the mysterious gap -- taking what is really only one side of being in the sense-world as totally given essential being, as a finished product. This kind of science has a supposition in principle about the activity of knowing that leads to simply photography. But it is worse because in supposing a complete object, with duality of observer and object, and while disparaging one's thinking and own completeness, one is made to be incomplete in relation to the object; as though we were to lose ourselves by our ignorant empirical voyeurism. We suppose the separate object to be complete only at the incomplete expense of creation and destruction. Here let us take a further tangent about this mistake.  
  
In Jean Baudrillard's "Simulacra & Simulation" (1981), he gives an indication that science and simulation destroy their objects. He writes, "In any case, the logical evolution of a science is to distance itself increasingly from its object, until it dispenses with it entirely", because science is "always murderous". This is the mystery and paradox again, that in order to gain information across two parts -- observer and object -- there has to be an exchange, relation, whereby the object is no longer itself untouched as it was supposed to be known. One might think as Baudrillard, that objective knowing then involves increasing distance and dispensing with the object. But in the way of paradox, it could equally be that the object should ever more come close, be absorbed, and united into our activity of knowing. It is not to do with distance per se, but to do with completeness. With Steiner our way of knowing works as "higher nature within nature" -- a non-dual (complete) principle of knowledge that avoids incompleteness as crossing the absolute mystery gap. What is higher nature? And does love and faith fit here too, or feeling activity as alluded to by science approaching and distancing? 

If objective knowing is paradoxical in this way, what is it missing? A photographic copy, a simulation, is incomplete. In a film scene Bruce Lee is teaching a pupil: "It's like a finger pointing away to the moon. Don't concentrate on the finger or you will miss all that heavenly glory." This is symbolic -- a finger in the student's experience, would in its outer form be something to concentrate on or copy while leaving open for a slap on the head, because the bare finger is not complete for the student as such. Actually it has one side open, that points to the mystery that is its inner, hidden, formative, creative, original, or causal condition, the glory of its completeness that is not given in mere sense-world experience. To observe the finger as mere finger is like to observe deadness, but the living finger has an intention behind it. I say by analogy, this mistake is like 'reductionism' in science, which loses all of that heavenly glory (and the fertility of Earth), by taking in confusion a living object to be mere dead object, since it mistakenly takes the outer form of experience to be complete in itself. Steiner says that we need not study living organic phenomena in science as reduced to the inorganic, physical laws,  
  
"The possibility was forgotten, however, that perhaps the concept of what is scientific is much broader than "the explanation of the world according to the laws of the physical world." [...] Instead of investigating what it is that makes the approach of the inorganic sciences scientific, and of then seeing a method that can be applied to the world of living things while adhering to the requirements that result from this investigation, one simply declared that the laws gained upon this lower stage of existence are universal." 

The view of physical or material reductionism in science is within popular discourse. 
A major premise in Yuval Harari's book "Homo Deus" (2016), is that the life sciences are telling us that organisms (humans) are biochemical reactions. Reductionism in science is assuming the object is separate from observer, complete in itself, can be known by dividing it into its smallest parts each of which perhaps, because irreducible, counts as explanation in a kind of dissociated knowledge. It is to treat everything as though its entirety is given to our knowledge in observation, flat and dead rather than living as a part of us. (By Non-duality, if we are alive, then all that is in our relation has the possibility of life, even what appears as mineral). To see all as like an inorganic mineral is a technical fixation. It becomes a science of infinite division, endless disconnected particulars that are collected as facts in mere juxtaposition, where one dead thing, being complete in itself, can be any way inter-changed with another because there is no depth of significance amongst the irreducible particulars, no real basis of meaning or ground of truth upon which it exists. (For example, as one atom can replace another in physics, so can a pig organ replace a human organ, by the technical view).   
  
For example, for the study of history, when dogmatic authority is peeled away and we have (dualist contra non-dual) objectivism, one is left with a collection of narratives side by side that have no ground of truth. Only there is story-telling in a flat (homogenous) space. Only partial truth perhaps comes from inter-subjective consensus reality where a group of people force reality over fiction, such as given in the examples of Harari's book. Hence an academic historian view arrives at this quote, "As human fictions are translated into genetic and electronic codes, the intersubjective reality will swallow up the objective reality and biology will merge with history. In the twenty-first century fiction might thereby become the most potent force on earth, surpassing even wayward asteroids and natural selection." (Biology and history are already merged in the profound religious sense of our being a microcosmic mirror of the macrocosm.) But it is clear that in the dualist (i.e. reductionist or technical) world view, having in principle lost ground of truth, one begins to take fiction, falsehood as though primary, which of course is logically impossible and characteristic of (mass) delusion. A societry that priveledges their fictions as though it were to replace objective reality is writing its death sentence, to put it mildly. Truth is forever most potent, not fiction, and we must realize truth.   
  
How do we make any sense? Let's read Steiner: 
  
"If thinking therefore makes a connection, forms a judgment, it is the very content of the ground of the world itself, having flowed into thinking, that is connected. In thinking, postulates are not given to us about some ground of the world in the beyond; rather the ground of the world, in its very substance, has flowed into thinking. We have direct insight into the factual grounds, not merely the formal grounds, for why a judgment takes place." 
  
"The judgment does not determine anything about something foreign to it but only about its own content. Our view, therefore, establishes a true knowing. Our epistemology is really critical."
  
"According to our view, not only must nothing be allowed in, with respect to revelation, for which there are no factual grounds within thinking; but also experience must be recognized not only from the aspect of its manifestation, but also within thinking, as something causative. Through our thinking we lift ourselves from the view of reality as a product to a view of reality as something that produces."
  
"Thus the essential being of a thing comes to light only when the thing is brought into relationship with the human being. For only within the human being does there manifest for each thing its essential being. This establishes relativism as a world view, that is, the direction in thought that assumes we see all things in the light bestowed upon them by human beings themselves. This view also bears the name anthropomorphism."
  
"It has many adherents. The majority of them, however, believe that this characteristic of our activity of knowing takes us away from objectivity as it is in and for itself. We perceive everything, so they believe, through the glasses of subjectivity. Our view shows us the exact opposite of this. We must look at things through these glasses if we want to come to their essential being. The world is not known to us only in the way it manifests to us, but rather it manifests as it is, although only to thinking contemplation. The form of reality that the human being produces in science is the ultimate, true form of reality." 
  
There is much to contemplate in these words. The gap of unrelated into related-ness is the divergent point of relativism and objectivism; for the relativist, the threshold gap is of into personal related-ness, whereas for the objectivist, the threshold is of into impersonal (worldly) related-ness. However, Non-duality implies a non-dual relativism to avoid incompleteness, such as Steiner has. This leads us to realize that we do and must participate in the true form of reality, because we are in it. We are never outside of nature. An implication is that one must always equally add to a fact its relation to our existence and value, otherwise it is no complete activity of knowing. When we separate fact and value, as if for means-ends, i.e. 'We shall look at facts that might later have value', then we come upon the limitations of duality. Science (when it is dualist) wants, according to Harari, to separate fact and value; just as Steiner says, 
  
"Now, however, it seems as though we ourselves are bringing in the subjective element here, which we had wanted so decisively to keep out of our epistemology. [...]" 
  
Steiner then gives an answer in defense of thought as having an inner lawfulness that maintains objectivity in the aspect of allowing thought-content to unfold in its own nature within thinking. But I shall introduce Buddhism here to both clarify and to connect with a consideration of knowledge more generally than in thought.  
  
We must come up against what is truth and what is falsehood in the connected aspects of fact and value. For we have so far found that Non-duality implies they must be together and we produce our reality. Truth is not a fact without us, but we live with the truth. As we are included in truth, and on the Buddhist view we generate intention, speech, and action, which always have some or another kind of value, and if knowledge can be gained, then we must ask which value leads most directly to knowledge (of the truth)? For Steiner, it is enough to say that harmony, organisation into unity, can come through lawful thinking, that is not a compulsion that would break the principle of experience. Buddhism presents us 
with another answer: it is wholesome value that leads most directly to knowledge. It is in the very word 'wholesome' that it concerns unity or completeness.  
  
For whoever is familiar with the Buddhist view of the path from wholesome view and virtuous intention to knowledge as unification of mind, then they may have an idea of what knowledge means in Buddhism -- it is also the spiritual goal called liberation, and there are a few kinds of true knowledge in its stages, such as re-collecting the divine memory of our past lives. The secular reader, bear with us, should note simply that completeness, knowledge, and truth, may include not only knowledge of what is external as external, but what is within us - our thought (per Steiner), mind, intention, awareness, or consciousness - as in the Delphic (and Christian and Buddhist) maxim, 'Know thyself', that also means, 'Know the truth of thyself'. For any of them, we can ask what is like their sphere of completeness, or higher nature. Steiner opens our world view (about thought) with a non-dual note, 
  
"Now admittedly, we are used to picturing a phenomenon in such a way that we need only approach it and passively observe it. This is not an absolute requirement, however. No matter how unusual it might be for us to picture that we ourselves actively bring something objective into manifestation — that we do not merely perceive a phenomenon, in other words, but produce it at the same time — it is not inadmissible for us to do so."
  
"One simply needs to give up the usual opinion that there are as many thought-worlds as there are human individuals. This opinion is in any case nothing more than an old preconception from the past." 
  
"It is tacitly assumed everywhere, without people realizing that there is another view at least just as possible, and that the reasons must first be weighed as to the validity of one or the other. Instead of this opinion, let us consider the following one: There is absolutely only one single thought-content, and our individual thinking is nothing more than our self, our individual personality, working its way into the thought-center of the world."   
  
In another book of Steiner's, he says that, "Human thinking is the shadow-image of mental pictures and beings belonging to a higher world, the world called the astral plane." (Reappearance of Christ in the Etheric, Rudolf Steiner). This is no small thesis because it is also the implicit thesis of religion, where we all come from the same source in our being, our desires, and awareness. It is not as if the re-joining communion of religion would be a compressed collection of meaningless irreducible particles -- it is a unification of even our consciousness or soul or spirit. If a unified field of awareness is termed 'God', we arrive at the religious idea as something like, 'All of our experience and world, all the images around and in us, are really the manifestation of the thought-forms of God, of the One' (which are experienced as separated and individual by the 'fetter of forgetfulness' after the whole cosmogony and instantiations of the spiritual hierarchies and rulers). That is Nonduality understood in relation to our experiential existence. It is a foreign concept in a science that takes everything as physical, and which gives no satisfactory answer to existential and religious questions, such as about what is consciousness - the so-called 'Other Minds' and 'Hard Problem of Consciousness' is based in Dualism, an incomplete supposition.  
  
Strange as it may sound, no physical material has ever been observed without being grasped as an object by the observer -- if there were no grasping (in the Buddhist sense of maintaining a pure, wholesome intention), we may come to higher knowledge as including what is within (and behind or original of us). (Of course, the doctrine of non-self is central to Buddhism because if we merely look within us in the same dualist way as externally, we would still be creating and destroying rather than observing truth. See the discourses of S.N. Goenka for more on the role of meditation as observing truth in the path to knowledge and liberation.) Steiner says that dualism leads to limits (in science), 
  
"Expressed in terms of our individual consciousness, this means that, for the purpose of establishing anything scientifically, we must remain strictly within what is given us in consciousness; we cannot step outside of this. Now, if one recognizes fully that we cannot skip over our consciousness without landing in non-being, but does not recognize at the same time that the essential being of things is to be encountered in our consciousness in the perception of ideas, erroneous views then arise that speak of a limit to our knowledge. But if we cannot get outside our consciousness, and if the essential being of reality is not within it, then we cannot press forward to essential being at all." 
  
This is precisely the point of Non-duality and the mystery. It is a matter of our principle and all its consequences that if we pretend to close the gap of mystery (how knowledge comes for us as thinking or conscious beings), skipping over our own being, then we are merely creating and destroying ourselves with ignorant science rather than knowing. If we are creating and destroying, we cannot arrive at what is most truthful and essential, and so there appears to be a limit to knowledge. There are correlates in religion, such as in Buddhism where, when one is not attaining to knowledge and liberation, one is generating karmic impurity that keeps one in the bondage of lower existence, and re-incarnated as such. In fact, Jesus also taught about reincarnation, which has been understood in esoteric Christianity, although in exoteric Christianity it was not so clear. The implications of limits with dualism are nothing less than the very limits of our science and technology, religion, and civilization, as it comes in action out of our erroneous world view. (Later, after we first appreciate non-duality, we can soften the discourse and say Dualism may in a way have its place and role in our being, even as it is limited. Dualism is to do with independence, and freedom, that is also the freedom to make mistakes and error.)
  
A major premise in Yuval Harari's book "Homo Deus" is that science does have religious goals, but in a technical view. The economy and government also: "more and more individuals, organisations, corporations and governments are taking very seriously the quest for immortality, happiness and godlike powers." But they bring a technical view -- that all problems are technical and every technical problem has a technical solution. What is the rational extension of Dualism (reductionism, objectivism) - is that we have fundamentally an endless collection of disconnected particulars side by side, which therefore can be inter-changed arbitrarily without any consequence for the observer, mysteriously standing outside of the system as a technician, scientist, economist, etc. - that is, like assuming the Creator position of God the supreme authority over creation and destruction.  
  
Yes, we all wish to be in paradise, to be in blissful rest or with great glory, but we first must understand in principle what that means in order to attain. Paradise is a completeness of being. (Completeness IS what the early Christian scriptures write about -- the Fullness, 'pleroma' in Greek, which is the origin and end above all dualities, the 'Father of All', the 'One Who Is', the self-generated, etc.) We must understand Non-duality. Steiner is warning us that Dualism is the wrong view or principle -- that results in the erroneous view of a limit to our knowledge. Jesus Christ the Redeemer, teacher of divine and cosmic consciousness, taught that the light of the Kingdom of Heaven is within us, not only externally up in the clouds or elsewhere. 

If I may share a counsel on truth... We are already with the truth, if we listen for the inner, small, still voice of wisdom within. If I am to assert in this article that righteousness, piety, and the saintly, sacred qualities are everywhere always most essential, and that by implication we must, with awareness, drop and renounce what is inessential (false, pretense, unwholesome), then it may be beneficial in the way that it helps to reflect to the reader what is already truth. Every day people make decisions with uncertainty, and justify their unwholesome actions, ex. "I know that's not good to do but...I have to do it for my family or my girlfriend." So, we continue to act with mixed karma, mixed destiny, where the good aspect favors or shadows over our on-going neglect or ignorance, the part we do not want to look at. 

Reflection, from meditation to therapy, is healing because it offers recognition of the truth. When we are given a clear image of our whole nature, including the dark shadowy side, it can be deeply healing. It is a re-cognition of pre-existent truth, as such with a familiarity...just as one can re-activate a familiar soreness or pain in the body that had an initial shock or blockage from years earlier, or from an on-going habitual excess or deficiency. But, whoever has not received fundamental education in awareness, often lives pushed and pulled by the degeneracy of nature and attachments of persona, seeking and never finding in mere externalities what is real fulfillment. The adolescent, rebellious voice of independence can take us far astray, for example. We escape, we indulge, we hold one over another, we fix our worldly beliefs, but not consciously realizing how truth is incorruptible. 

Truth does not disappear when we escape, just as (see Hans Wilhelm) suicide is even not an escape from suffering but keeps us in suffering and reincarnation. I imagine that if the world could see a clear whole image of itself now, it might be both warmly spirited for its goodness, and yet petrified for its dark side. We have to face the dark side in truth, and shine the light of loving-kindness. We have some increasing awareness of ecological crisis, and little awareness of our technological crisis, but how deep really are our crises? The darkness and ignorance of our on-going livelihoods are not something to be passed over in false, removed hopes, as though we were not still presently liable in harming ourselves more deeply; it is in us, amassing knots of destiny, and in our ancestors, in our children and in seven generations, and in our next lives. (See below for more on the rational note on reincarnation). 

It may be challenging, having largely structured our cities around the ecomonic motive with technology. The church was usually the highest building in antiquity, while now it is the sky-scraper. But, may we have real awareness, faith, equanimity, determination of wholesome, righteousness - the rest follows. It is the only way to real fulfillment. To see that truth is unsurpassable, understanding the implications of its unity, is really a rational way to arrive at faith as ground of being. (It is almost comical even that we should have to gain a principle of reality from the religious view, while technical sciences are misplacing us in massive fictions.) I am sharing this counsel because I anticipate, from some quarter, adolescent-like responses, 'I don't want to hear that, ...I want to keep doing what I am doing.' And the adolescent is keen on seeing hypocrisy. Or the prideful parent, 'I invested so much in this matter, I cannot abandon it.' The author too, has the aspects of innocent child, rebellious teenager, and prideful parent. Still, I write for the benefit of all beings, and wish all beings to be happy, when I say that pretenses, from personal through dualist science, economy, and technology, are not ours to keep in their errors, and holding on will only hurt more. The words of the Son of the Father in heaven may guide us.        
  
The futures of techno-humanism and Data-religion that Harari presents are looking externally, in technology and economics, for salvation. But this is limited. It can only ever achieve the image, likeness of paradise but which is external to our being and at our own expense. Read from the Gospel of Thomas (3, 1-3),  
  
    Jesus said, "If your leaders say to you, 'Look, the kingdom is in heaven,' then the birds of heaven will precede you. If they say to you, 'It is in the sea', then the fish will precede you. Rather, the kingdom is inside you and it is outside you. 
  
To which I will add: if our leaders say it is in technology or the economy, these mechanisms will precede us... Techno-economic salvation involves, in religious terms, a temptation, and a fall of our higher nature, and loss of knowledge that is already latent in us. We must clarify the principle of Non-duality that we can only arrive at knowledge, truth, and paradise, as higher nature within nature, with the truth that is already inside us. Steiner tells us - it is an absolute gap limitation in outer empiricism (objectivism) with the inductive method:  
  
"One demands outer empiricism so generally today because one believes that, with every assumption going beyond the empirically given, one is groping about in uncertainty. We see that we can remain completely within the phenomena and still arrive at what is necessary." 
  
"The inductive method adhered to so much today can never do this. Basically, it proceeds in the following way. It sees a phenomenon that occurs in a particular way under the given conditions. A second time it sees the same phenomenon come about under similar conditions. From this it infers that a general law exists according to which this event must come about, and it expresses this law as such."
  
"Such a method remains totally outside the phenomena. It does not penetrate into the depths. Its laws are the generalizations of individual facts."
  
"It must always wait for confirmation of the rule by the individual facts." 
  
Usually this is a concern in the philosophy of science and with empirical rationalism. Nicolas Taleb wrote a book called "the Black Swan: The Impact of the Highly Improbable" (2007), that concerned the limitations of statistics, though perhaps within the framework still of statistics. But with inductive method in statistics, we remain totally outside the phenomenon, across the mysterious gap that has to be acknowledged in principle. Of Goethe, Steiner writes,  
  
"The point for him is never what purpose something serves but always how it develops. He does not want to consider an object as a thing complete in itself but rather in its becoming, so that he might know its origins." 
  
In this sense, to know a thing is like a parallelism (like Baudrillard's distancing and dispensing with the object), rather than a perpendicular penetration (like 'murderous' science). The sense of this in Nonduality is that perpendicular, Dualist (observer-object) observation involves quasi-knowing through creation and destruction, an incompleteness, whereas the parallel Dualist observation involves quasi-knowing by alignment of the two natures (observer-object) but at a constant separation, and the parallel and perpendicular aspects meet in approaching origination, which alone can encompass the complete truth.  
  
Symbolically, - we need not drawn dualistic implications - the perpendicular aspect is like (differentiating for outward power) paternal nature and the parallel aspect is like (unifying for inner growth) maternal nature. With this symbolism, there is a religious correlate of knowledge with the so-called fruit of knowledge. Higher knowledge was prior to the splitting of Adam and Eve in paradise into two separate natures. (And in one view of early Christianity, carnal inter-course became a kind of enslavement that blinds us to higher knowledge and keeps us sub-servient to lower powers). Knowledge is equated to life, the real life, whereas ignorance is equated to death. Whoever comes to true knowledge is one like the immortals (which is a goal of technical science and the global elite). 
  
On direction in science, Steiner explains that intuition indeed has a valid role in science. (Intuition is valid since we produce the true form of reality yet must do so in a precise way). And, a moral ideal is a living ideal in that its content is active and leading us. (Since fact and value are inseparable, moral values have a ground of truth in our being). And as higher nature within nature, we must look beyond mere outer empiricism:  
  
"Whatever is not mere description in mathematics, physics, and mechanics must be archetypal phenomenon." 
  
"All progress in science depends upon becoming aware of archetypal phenomena. When one succeeds in lifting a process out of its connections with other ones and explaining it purely as the result of definite elements of experience, then one has penetrated a step deeper into the working of the world." 
  
Wow. Steiner was not only intellectually way ahead of his time, but he was so as a Christian esotericist. His studies on the evolution of consciousness in the epochs of humanity, and the implications of Christianity are wonderful. Here, in the "Theory of Knowledge Implicit in Goethe's World Conception", we have a principle of knowledge to reckon with. Non-duality as an idea is ancient, but here we have it well applied within Western philosophy. I am overflowing in joy for this book. Now, in the history of Western philosophy we can see a path to spiritual science. In other lectures and books, Steiner has more to say about spiritual science, and indeed many people have taken up his indications and gone further with Goethean science. How, again, does Non-duality (completeness, as opposed to incompleteness in principle) open the door to spirit? 
  
What is spirit? It is I think, in one way of looking at it, approximately, the formative within form. It is a gross mistake to think that referring to spirit is magical, mystical, mysterious in the sense of not for rational or scientific discourse as unfalsifiably hidden. It is rather an arrogance in our principle of knowledge that we should assume or neglect that there is not any hidden or inward nature, interiority, that surpasses the linear physical or material dimension. It is rather this Dualism which, neglecting the full reality of what is necessary to arrive at real knowledge, creates an unfalsifiability, and endless problem of lack of knowledge, from the limited (incomplete) supposition or principle where fact is separate from value. There is truly a mystery to be acknowledged (following from the principle of Non-duality), and if we pretend there is none then we get stuck. There is a hidden part of the sense-world, verily, in that it is not given in complete essential being to us (by reduction), and the way to arrive at knowledge is again, as higher nature within nature. 
  
In the collection of lectures called "The Reappearance of Christ in the Etheric", Steiner says, "Let us be clear about this: everything that confronts us externally in the physical world is an image of the spiritual; the spiritual has formed it. If the spiritual is forming something physical, it can form it in such a way that at a certain stage of evolution this physical form is either more similar or less similar to it, or is more or less dissimilar from it." The physical can be dissimilar from a spiritual formative force because it is like the outer stoppage or intersection of various formative forces. The gross physical phenomena are seen as formed from what is primary in the formative process, the spirit. Similarly, a locus of causal origin in the Buddhist view is the mind or intention, which is most important because it always precedes as the origin of the grosser forms of speech and physical action. In Christianity also, the cosmogonic myths refer to 'Perfect Mind', 'Insight' (epinoia), 'Forethought', and such in the creation of our material realm, and the introduction of 'Error' (falsehood) from 'Presumptuous Thought' that bears a relation to the creation of darkness, ignorance, and death.   
  
Darwinian evolution, of course, is the theory that is supposed to technicalize our explanations in life science. It has really overshadowed our conceiving of any other possible formative processes, and separated religion from science. Darwinian evolution is that with heredity, variation, and natural selection, certain forms or beings outlive others (and many undeserved implications from this have been derived to this day by intellectual or rational but confused people). But, where do we attribute the introduction of variability and the form of selection? Perhaps to the immediate environment, one would say. Well, the immediate environment is really in a combination of earthly and cosmic forces, of both periodic (regular) and aperiodic (irregular) patterning, among other characteristics of formation. The orbit of the moon, for example, exerts a regular rhythmic force on the earth and therefore any life forms that evolve on it. Such forces are a condition of our evolution and being -- expressed physically, for example, in that a woman's period cycle is about the length of the lunar cycle, and our bodily functioning is organized by circadian and other rhythms. It is as simple as this to begin to see through limitations of popular and scientific discourse that have been dualist and self-limiting. Darwinism gives us a one-sided, incomplete equation by taking the survivor (or surviving genes, or entity), as if complete in itself (that came to falsely justify inequality) rather than as a projection of an inter-connected process. So be rid of the Darwinian theory of evolution as such!  
  
On the other hand, naive sentiments come up also with a misunderstanding of the Buddhist concept of karma. Karma is like what Christianity refers to as the 'knots of destiny' and for the Greeks it was the realm of fate. With Darwinism, as anyone can find in on-line comments, a naive person says, 'this person, not me, came to injury and were killed - good for our evolution because we have lost them who could be injured!'. With a misunderstanding of karma the naive person says, 'this person, not me, came to injury -- good, they deserved it!'. One has to realize that the knots of destiny, though very personal in some ways, are also very inter-connected -- we are all one. That is the aspect of Non-duality and religion. It is the basis of saintly compassion that one realizes the inter-connection of all beings, the equality of all beings, thinking: 'this person may carry such and such a burden (issue, trauma, pain), and I too carry an aspect of that burden -- I see the dark side of myself and therefore cannot hold myself higher than another person -- truly I must have humility and modesty'. It is in the circle of life, the sacred hoop, the wheel of dharma that no one is above or below another, but in one family. No more should we think in the linear-progress lens of inequality, that in the data-techno-scientific age our elders simply lose relevancy and value and that they can be spurned -- and neither for the impending loss of economic value for many worker! Ordinary economic value should not be conflated with the value of a person -- who is bound up as a microcosm in the macrocosm, who has their own part to play in God's plan (see Christianity and below) and in our own unfolding. When we rationally accept the incorruptibility of truth, the transcendence of truth above orders, gain faith that all is inter-connected in a profound way, then we can sit with and care for an elderly person even without expecting any material returns - for That art Thou. (I don't mean here to specify any spiritual mandate nor anything like that we should place rational faith over the drawings of our hearts, but just maybe a nudge of 'Give a little bit, be open hearted' because what we believed, with rational dualist science was, after all, not the ultimate). How may we consider the knots of destiny? 
  
We are born out of the cosmos and earth. Consider that if, in our evolution, there are cosmic forces that have circular lawful relations - like the orbit of the cosmic bodies - those lawful relations have a symmetry or a repeated aspect. Then in our being, the elements or formative forces of our past being (such as from struggles of existence) are to bear on our being in the future. If we admit also aperiodic and more asymmetrical forces, then we are considering the formative aspect that is differentiating, like a linear direction. But Non-duality is a principle by which we should understand that it is an incomplete supposition to say that there is any absolutely differentiating process in the sense of Something coming from Nothing. We can have what appears linear as the tangential segment of a large circle, but not a linear direction totally without any reciprocal lawfulness. I am only giving an idea about what has been studied in spiritual science. For Darwinism, it gives consideration that especially in the realm of fate, what appears as a one-sided survivor is only so as subject of reciprocal laws, rather than simply a linear advancement. The manner in which one survives is not irrelevant and not dispensed with, when there is reciprocality. And so we open the door in science for the kind of unified law that is in religious terms, the justice established in the heavens and in the hierarchies after the foremost and highest.  
  
The Theory of Knowledge opens the door to spirit, to re-characterizing evolution as a reciprocal law, to understanding spirit such as the formative within form, to what in religious terms are the 'knots of destiny'. Any physical, materialist Theory of Everything, will be always incomplete -- the knots in nonduality (unlike String Theory) concern our very existence, our minds and destiny. There is more implication yet for science and religion. I would like now to come back on the question of what is nondual knowledge and the limit of duality or formality before considering further the religious side of knowledge.  
  
Steiner in 'The Theory of Knowledge...' may have anticipated what came decades later by another Austrian in mathematical logic: Godel's incompleteness theorem published around 1931. This is a result that is still very under-appreciated, as is Steiner's work. It shows that any formal (dualized) system of sufficient basic power has fundamental limitations, which can be shown with self-referential expressions. If the West previously did not understand non-duality from Eastern religious thought, nor understand what is sacred from the Native Americans (bless them) that they partially desacrated (there is no complete desacralization), then now it has a chance to take it from its own Western history of philosophy and mathematical logic, its own forgotten forefathers. Experts already know about Godel's incompleteness theorem, but they did not understand the full implications of it in the sense of non-duality. Steiner's work based in Goethe is thus beneficial. I hope that we shall come to see that Non-duality helps us to really makes (rational) sense of ancient thought, archetypes, religious symbolism, the Beatitudes and scriptures, faith, praise, and the like, and much to do with spirituality in a way that can come to enlighten all our thinking, feeling, and activity.  
  
The Buddhist scriptures are very clear and extensive. For them, there is a path to the arising of true knowledge. One kind of true knowledge is the memory of past lives, that occurs at a certain stage of the purification of the mind in the Buddha's discipline. The path to this knowledge and to the knowledge of liberation from worldly suffering, begins with the 'right view' - understanding what is wholesome and unwholesome. They are presented in groups of 3. What is unwholesome is greed, hatred, and delusion. What is wholesome is non-greed (generosity), non-hatred (loving-kindness), and non-delusion (insight). For the Buddhist, an ordinary person is deluded about the true deeper reality of which they participate. Both Buddha and Jesus describe how some (or many) ordinary deluded or animalistic people are running into darkness (ignorance, death), while there is a path to brightness (knowledge, salvific life). This fits well with a nondual relativism like Steiner presents, where in principle the possibility of gaining, arriving at greater knowledge is not limited. If we want to become divine or god-like, there is a just and saintly process of attainment. Now, these are the Buddhist categories that distinguish kinds of intention, speech, and action as a causal origin. And the Buddha says very clearly in one sutta that, to paraphrase, 'it is peace that comes from peace, not violence that comes from peace. It is violence that comes from violence, not peace that comes from violence.' Simple, no means-ends separation, necessary and essential.  
  
Now, the qualities of wholesome and unwholesome are important distinctions because the characteristic of wholesome-ness is unification and completeness, whereas the characteristic of unwholesomeness is separation and incompleteness. That's all we need to realize that virtue is the path to knowledge. When, in non-duality, fact is not separate from value, the value that leads to truth is precisely that which is wholesome and virtuous, hence called skillful action in Buddhism. Virtue is skillful, leading to knowledge, and at the same time we gain an understanding of what true knowledge is by learning and practicing the Buddhist noble eight-fold path. (There are many commonalities to point out with Christianity and other religions, by the way, such as on the role of meditation and prayer.) 
  
If we consider further along knowledge as completeness including our own spirit, the formative within form, we may come to see the religious principle of sanctification. The historian of religion Mircea Eliade gives us an overview of historical religious sanctification in his book, "The Sacred and the Profane". Consider this quote: 
  
"The man of archaic societies tends to live as much as possible *in* the sacred or in close proximity to consecrated objects. The tendency is perfectly understandable, because, for primitives as for the man of all pre-modern societies, the *sacred* is equivalent to a *power*, and, in the last analysis, to *reality*. The sacred is saturated with *being*. Sacred power means reality and at the same time enduringness and efficacity. The polarity sacred-profane is often expressed as an opposition between *real* and *unreal* or pseudoreal. [...] Thus it is easy to understand that religious man deeply desires *to be*, to participate in *reality*, to be saturated with power. [...] The completely profane world, the wholly desacralized cosmos, is a recent discovery in the history of the human spirit. [...] desacralization pervades the entire experience of the nonreligious man of modern societies and that, in consequence, he finds it increasingly difficult to rediscover the existential dimensions of religious man in the archaic societies." 
  
In his view, what is sacred is that which, through proximity and ritual enactment, is a participation in the saturated being of sacred spirit, of our origin in the cosmogony -- religious humanity becomes a union with our origin, the power that created us, and therefore to be in what makes us real, what is real. The sacred, transcendent spirit, comes to be the true center of reality, and it is what is our condition, self-contained, self-sufficient. Without our origin and creation, we can no longer exist as such, and we lose the power of reality, and that is the profane existence of the lower human plane. 

Sanctification I should like to be considered in the political question of 'what is religious freedom to which we have a right?'. At the intersection of politics, religion, and technology, for example, I could ask: does a prisoner have the right to sacred fire (candles) or sun-light in place of profane artificial electric light? One who has not studied religious matters would hardly give it question, because ordinary people live in profanity and godlessness. Outside of prison we are already enslaved by our ignorance. (Police should be trained to see the light in all people, not only to see criminals, because we necessarily participate in the true form of reality.) But in another article I may concern further the harmful relation of electricity and magnetism to the human spirit. Yes, most people are increasingly aware of the ecological crisis, but less are aware of technological crisis, which I shall only begin to address here.   
  
Let us realize -- knowledge, truth, completeness, justice, wholesome-ness or virtue, peace, loving-kindness, harmony, sacred responsibility, liberation, divinity, and sanctification -- they all go hand in hand. Sacred spirit is the path to heaven on earth, as above so below. The world needs at a moment of collective spiritual crisis to realize there is a pre-existent divine power to know and commune with through our higher self (and humility of the lower self); to cultivate saintliness and discover the real holy teachings; to bring back or increase the sacred dimension into all our livelihoods. The sacred, being what ultimately sanctifies, is primary whereas all else of business and preoccupation is secondary. 

I was surprised to learn economy stock prices are tied to or dependent on the sun, among many diverse data, and thus that the economy is already expanding to stabilize itself in aspects of cosmic bodies. Yet, nothing will stabilize humanity or the economy more than righteousness, which entails the real discovery of what is essential and sacred.

In spiritual science, it is realized that not gravity per se, but the forces of the plant kingdom are what hold the Earth together. They are life forces that combine above and below, heaven and earth. Similarly, it is our righteous verticality, connecting heaven and earth, that sanctifies our existence, and being with truth and justice that holds us together most fundamentally.       
  
The virtues in Buddhism are, by the way, precise about wholesome-ness. It is not merely ordinary good intention, which can rather be a mix of wholesome and unwholesome quality. The first book I read which made the right view and virtue clear to me is Bikkhu Bodhi's, 'In the Words of Buddha', and I consider it thus to be a real holy teaching. It is largely based in the scriptures of 'dhamma' which anyone with Internet can easily access on the website called Access to Insight (.org). Beyond reading, it is important to have contact with the actual practice of holy teachings, and for this I recommend the 10-day course taught by S.N. Goenka in Vipassana -- there are centers for this around the world.  
  
When it comes to Christianity, following Steiner's work, the scriptures, and others, it is clear that it has been and will remain most significant for humanity. I am aware of the pain and grief people feel in regard to religious history in their family, as well as the ways that it seems to have lost relevancy to our youth. I am sorry for it and I hope that this aspect may find forgiveness and reconciliation. We must never turn on the real holy teachings, lest we lose the message of our greatest treasure and refuge. The Christian mystery of Golgotha, the original teachings of Jesus, and the cosmic and esoteric perspectives of Christianity, are most significant. We should never confuse the original holy teachings with particular distortions of it, which may come about. The Nag Hammadi library, translated by an international team of scholars, is a historical testament that early Christianity was not what many are familiar with as Roman Catholicism. Indeed, the Roman empire rather had sent an order to destroy scriptures other than the selections of our familiar biblical New and Old Testament. The control and power of Roman Christianity maintained a patriarchal control (over the teachings and generally), and even if they have desired to make changes with the new Pope, theirs is one of the slowest organisations in the world, as it appears, as I have heard.  
  
The religious scholar Bart D. Ehrman has a book called, "Misquoting Jesus: The Story Behind Who Changed the Bible and Why" (2007) that goes through changes in the bible by many translations of scribes, and distinguishing between both accidental and intentional alterations. We must realize first of all that there is a holy teaching about truth and salvation, and not get caught in mis-construed spirituality or religion, as even clergy may be in the way of this holy teaching. In the Nag Hammadi, I read that it is a most great sin to call priests of the church as fathers, and even the god of the world and flesh is not the true Father, but there is the incomprehensible Father of All, the Fullness, to be believed in.     
  
I suppose that in Quebec, where I live, there is a deep pain, evidenced in the fact that many Quebecois swear words refer to religious objects, about the Catholic church's patriarchal power - being too strict in family life and inviting Catholic guilt. The concept of sin as often assumed here is not what Jesus taught. 'Sin' at the time referred to 'missing the mark', like when shooting an arrow at a target and missing -- it is unskillful. To sin rather than be righteous is unskillful because it is not in alignment or 
accord with our sanctification, our deepest wish that is sacred as Mircea Eliade shows. In Buddhism too, we all share a deep fundamental wish (as implied by Non-duality). Thus, one who sins should adjust their aim, to become skillful and wholesome, for the benefit of all. 

For some ordinary people, Christianity has little meaning, and they suppose that even having read the bible and knowing about morality, they will anyway choose to be not moral because its their choice. Such a person has no insight to the holy teachings, and are at a much greater loss than they realize. In the Buddhist way, one who really understands wholesome-ness, the right view, is bound to follow with the right (righteous) intention. To be Christian, in one sense, is to identify with Christ consciousness as in this prayer: 'May I be one with the mind of Christ. May I be one with the heart of our (divine) Mother.' (For Christ has everything. One can never fully enjoy one's apparent possessions without first 'knowing thyself', without knowledge of truth that has moral justification.)  
  
To address the mystery, Non-duality, completeness, with Christianity, I want to make the following connection on behalf of rational or reasoned religiosity: We spoke about mystery in two ways -- as an absolute mystery of the gap between Nothing and Something...must that be impossible (impassible) and incomplete (incomprehensible)? And a softened version of it with self-connected (unifying) infinity (differentiating) - or like the archetypal duality of Mother and Father. (And I connected these to a phenomenological view of knowledge in "The Theory of Knowledge", then to Buddhist knowledge). Now, we are familiar with Christ as the Logos, the Word of the Father of All, the Fullness, and the idea of an image from on high in Creation. There is much described like this in the Nag Hammadi early Christian texts, for example in The Tripartite Tractate, "All these spiritual stations are set apart by a spiritual power from those who belong to the remembrance, a power that consists of an image of what separates the Word from the Fullness."  
  
In the introduction to the Gospel of Truth, "The work of the Savior was not only to bring knowledge to earthly humans, but also to rectify the cosmic error. He revealed the unknown Father to the aeons and gave them a proper, harmonious relationship to their originator. Although the Savior, as a historical person, is identical with Jesus, he is also, from a higher and more fundamental perspective, the Son, the Word, the Name of the Father; he is the first emanation, who manifests the Father to the aeons and causes them to become perfect beings". We see here a kind of relation between the Word and Father of All, and for us as beings of existence. I would like to suggest that the absolute mystery is like the Christian Father of All -- the self-generating 'Father' who is unity, fullness, completeness. As Something from itself in total completeness, without a need for anything from Nothing, transcendent and without beginning or end, this fits with the descriptions of the scriptures, such as that His perfection is held back and unknowable, incomprehensible for us.   
  
On the other hand, there is a certain relation between the absolute Father (like the absolute mystery), and the Name of the Father, the Word, the logos Christ, which bears a likeness, as an image or emanation of the Father. Christ is not an absolute mystery like the Father but comes in the image of it. This is like the softened version of the mystery, which hence enters into our existence and becomes knowable. In the infinity, self-connected, of becoming and existence, there is a center of being, as truth or perfection, that is mediated by Christ. It is that liminal space of truth between the gap Nothing and Something, coming upon itself - with self-reference and completeness, whereby perfection lies with Christ, who is thus an emanation or image of the absolute mystery of the Fullness. As we identify with Christ consciousness, we come to true knowledge and life because it is with the mind of Christ that we rise to perfection beyond the lower world of materiality, ignorance, and death (imprisonment in the body, reincarnation, as in Buddhism). To identify with Christ is to be a child of the Fullness, of the light, and to have the greatest sanctification, salvation, refuge, peace, stability, certainty or knowledge, and so on.  
  
Much could also be related from the Nag Hammadi scriptures to phenomenology - such as the relation of the hidden to the visible; and to the earlier point about the limits of simulation (or duality in science), which can be related with 'imitation' and 'shadow'; to indications that the spiritual is the real form of existence, the truth and rest, whereas inferior being comes as an imitation. Shadow is the root of visible things, that are separated. What begins in perishable nature has an end in perishable nature, whereas what is imperishable is without beginning or end.  
  
In Buddhism, by contrast, we may not at first hear about the divine, nor any Creation myths or cosmogony. Even, they don't believe in souls and God per se. And yet there is a Buddhist teaching about reincarnation, divine planes of existence, and stories about the Buddha's relations in the heavens and divine. Buddha said roughly that he knew vastly more than he taught. That was an aspect of his wisdom - to teach only what is essential to arriving at liberation and higher knowledge. In three parts, his discipline was only virtue (living a holy life), concentration (on the spiritual practice of meditation meant to purify the mind), and wisdom (how to abide in equanimity). This I have related already to completeness and incompleteness. Both Buddhism and Christianity, by the proper holy teachings, offer us a path to knowledge and wholeness.    
  
We have gone briefly from Western philosophy in Goethe through Steiner, to Godel, Buddhism, and Christianity, all in the indications of Non-duality, knowledge, truth, and righteousness, in order to arrive at the right world view with a pure (wholesome) intention and open heart. World views based in Dualism pre-suppose incompleteness. Now, in preparation of addressing further the views in Harari's "Homo Deus", intelligence in Nick Bostrom's "Superintelligence", and charity in William MacAskill's, "Doing Good Better", we shall trace a little about the recent historical desacralization of the world in connection with the new-scientific and technical world view.    
  
In the history of Western philosophy, the "Age of Enlightenment" is associated with the scientific revolution, of the 16th and 17th centuries. It is the ideals, principles, of this period that are in defense now by a champion of the new scientific world view, Steven Pinker, in his book "Enlightenment Now" (2018). As David Loy in "Ecodharma: Buddhist Teachings for the Ecological Crisis" (2018) puts it, the old order with a sacred dimension was dying and the main characteristics of our modern world (view), including mechanistic science, developed in the chaos of those centuries. The crisis of the time was "initiated largely by the Protestant Reformation". He writes, "Luther and Calvin eliminated the intricate web of mediation (by sacraments, priests, icons, holy days, monasticism, pilgrimages, and so forth) between God and this world--a network that had constituted, in effect, the sacred dimension of this world. For Protestant believers, mystery and miracle became de-emphasized in ways that opened the door for the materialist explanations of science [...]." This is just one way or aspect of considering the sacred dimension of the world. 

The sacred can also be attributed in other ways, and here for example Jesus 
attributes it to the nature we are bound up with: Jesus said (Book of Thomas), "Woe to you who dwell in error, not seeing that the light of the sun, which judges the universe and looks down on the universe, will encircle everything to make slaves of the enemies. Nor do you perceive how the moon looks down night and day, seeing the bodies of your slaughters." By Non-duality, the connection of everything is the reason that all that we think, speak, and do are known to the universe, the truth, and the divine, for there is no total separation of the individual self. That comes into the rotation and judgement of existence. But the point for now is that a de-sacralization of the world (view) occurred around the 16th and 17th centuries (whereas a treatment of de-sacralization in general could include much more).   
  
Loy goes on, that the early scientists of the period were religious, but they developed a new paradigm that "God rules the universe not through a hierarchy of spiritual subordinates but with a rational system of 'hidden laws'". We could understand with the perspective of Non-duality the processes of the Christian spiritual hierarchies, the nature of universal justice, and so on.  
  
"God's hidden laws" for the early religious scientists became the secular, impersonal, physical law, which could be used to "manipulate others for their own purposes" (quoted in Ecodharma) by those who comprehended them. Johannes Kepler likened the "celestial machine", "not to a divine organism but to a clockwork". David Loy shows that this is one of the historical roots of our ecological crisis, and is based in Dualism.  
  
Desacralization is from God or holistic organism to dualist mechanism, as in the 16th and 17th centuries. A machine has a machine-maker, a designer, who first sets the machine in motion, which thereafter follows all impersonal, causal, physical law. With mechanistic view, it seems one can all at once avoid responsibility and claim authority. The impersonal physical law is what gives order, the foundation of knowing and truth -- I can simply point outside of myself for the responsibility of universal order. And yet, because it is impersonal, there is no meaning or God, there needs to be a machine-maker, we entitle ourselves to becoming the Creator. If we follow Non-duality in Steiner's thought, we should rather see that yes -- we are co-creators and God and truth are within us -- but it is the falsehood, the unwholesome, separative persona in the position of Creator that is problematic (when it is not oriented to the unsurpassable, the sacred - in Christianity we are invited to be co-creators, but who give glory to God). Mechanization tried to make room for humans to be the bearers of ultimate power and authority, and if we are honest about our crises, it is failing.  
  
In that view, the dead mineral world, like an endless collection of disconnected particulars, can be arbitrarily put together by us into whatever purpose or machine that serves us. We are the creators and authority over what is lifeless, dead, mineral, the lowest, irreducible elements or atoms of existence. When we view the Earth not even as a living organism, but as lifeless mineral, then it becomes arbitrarily exploitable. We do not have responsibility for that which is totally disconnected - it does not have any meaning of its own, so we can simply absorb it indefinitely. In psychological terms, this view is like the expression of an infantile wish for the unlimited warmth and sustenance of the mother, that manifests in the prideful adult as 'the flood of rationalizations, cover-ups, evasions of the true issue' (to use Wilhelm Reich's terms), that is behind our crisis and which mechanizing (objectifying) is seen in indiscriminate and criminal behaviors. 
  
In "Homo Deus" it is made clear that technology and economic growth are seen as a new beacon of salvation, that comes with the mechanical, technical view. Harari writes of death for example, "Humans always die due to some technical glitch. The heart stops pumping blood. The main artery is clogged by fatty deposits. Cancerous cells spread in the liver. Germs multiply in the lungs. And what is responsible for all these technical problems? Other technical problems. [...] It is all technical problems. And every technical problem has a technical solution." Have you heard of the horrors of organ transplants?  
  
In the technical view, there is no responsibility for inter-changeability because it's all just dead impersonal physical disconnected particulars. We don't imagine that everything is connected (Non-duality) and hence contains and hides significance or meaning, and that if we create and destroy what appears outside of us, we also create and destroy the ground of our being. The metaphor of a clock was used in the historical mechanical view. How does technology relate to our world view? 
  
Gopi Krishna Vijaya articulates well the history of technology. Technologies have always proceeded out of the human form. External instrumentalization, that is the form of the duality of means and ends, were always secondary to human form. It began on an outer physical level: the arm and fist became a hammer, the joint a leverage, the hand a screw driver, and so on. Musculature inspired electricity, the eye-ball lens inspired the microscope, and so on. The idea of technology is preceded always by insight into our own ability. Once externalized, we have a trade-off.  
  
As external, it becomes repeatable and intensifiable at a much greater scale than of ordinary human ability in a way that is not dependent on our own human ability. One imagines the linear, unbounded (disconnected, non-reciprocal), increase or growth of this external technological power. The same understanding and emphasis on merely explosive forces is why we have dead rather than living tap water, that neglects the reality of nature with its counter-forces. But in by-passing our self-formed capacities, and being dependent on the tool, we lose our inherent abilities. Once machines did the heavy lifting, we became weaker; once we had glasses, people needed glasses; once we had writing and recording, we lost our memory. And so on, roughly. In Baudrillard's terms, what happens next from losing original nature is the artificial resurrection of the dead. We inadequately try to compensate for what we have lost through simulation. I hope it is clear from above that there is no substitute for truth and sacred origin. There is a profound falseness in achieving small-god-like power through external means of technology, and there is bound to be a limitation, and a reciprocality in effect. This in religious terms, is idolatry, failing to appreciate the highest power that leads to our destruction. Duality, and duality in the form of objectified technology, involves temptation, that is, of missing the mark unskillfully and requiring redemption. It is not technology alone that saves us, and technology per se may have detrimental effects.  
  
If the trend in technology continues in proceeding from our understanding of the human bodies, it moves from the lower to higher bodies; from physical, to life body, to the conscious body of humanity. That is a view towards Artificial Intelligence, implying the concern that technologization now already or next will be of the externalization of consciousness: we have no need to think or even to be aware when algorithmic calculation is at our service...it will become repeatable, reproducible, scalable, with great ease, but at the expense of our own self-formed ability and control; that is the temptation, that leads us step by step into darkness, unconsciousness. It might be argued that this has already happened since the dual ideology of the mechanical view and Darwinism, whereafter we regimented our lives in an automated way as a means for an end, and when the economic and nation-state motives suppressed the creativity and freedom of the human spirit in its cosmic fullness.  
  
If one really understands Non-duality and truth, one will have the right view. Whatever is unwholesome, a falsehood, not sacred and complete but incomplete, is subject to the ultimate bound of truth. If it partially asserts its falsehood, then it can only maintain itself as falsehood through ever increasing effort, energy, or acceleration until it becomes exhausted and falls back toward the original truth. You can read this into the 'Our Boys Didn't Die in Vain' syndrome that Harari describes, other of his and Baudrillard's examples, or in any process abstractly. It is an archetypal consequence of Non-duality. And, it gives us serious concern about techno-economic salvation.  
  
The economy for example, Harari tells us, needs to keep growing in order to sustain itself. It must accelerate, always improving 'efficiency' and production. GDP average increases, with an accelerating speed, and with greater inequality. "The winning strategy is usually to invest the barest minimum in nonproductive essentials, while maximising your productive assets." Errors come in each part of this formula. Ordinary economics does not really know what is essential -- what is sacred. It depends on guesswork and inductive method that remains outside of the phenomena it concerns. That is the primary error. Second, on the growth side, as Donella Meadows might say, it is that it pushes or pulls growth in the wrong direction. That is the correlary of the 3 roots of evil -- the primary ignorance of what is essential, and the other two wavering ignorances of pushing and pulling, grasping in the wrong way. 

A truly sacred and non-dual economics would, perhaps, expand our consciousness, our peace and harmony. And that involves righteousness, just as the Egyptians were an order of magnitude longer-lasting in their stability of civilization (~3000 years versus usual 300 years), they were highly pious or religious, and they had great works. One can read about how dualism and homogeneity (i.e. money as disconnected particular of uniform exchange) in capital economics is problematic and how economics needs to align with sacrality in "Sacred Economics" by Charles Eisenstein. In "Ecodharma", there is an example about how narrow profit-oriented production causes destruction of life -- by people that have not yet realized the inter-dependence of all of us, in this life and the next and always. 
  
Now I have outlined already the principle concerns in order to address the popular discourse in "Homo Deus", concerning technology, science, religion, and the future. We must understand what the implications are of Non-duality and Steiner's "The Theory of Knowledge...". It implies the limit of formality, of simulation, of inductive-empirical science as I have described. It implies the limit of duality in technological instrumentalization. It implies the limit of unwholesome, immoral, falsehood. And the limits, as such, are profound in the sense that they require a path back toward truth if they miss the mark, just like another round of lower existence in Buddhist thought of cosmology and salvation. To live by the pretense of Duality is nothing less than to be deceived, just as 'devil' and 'diabolic' is etymologically related to Two-ness -- like seeing one side and not the hidden side.  
  
Harari recognizes that modern society is in crisis:  
"The modern deal thus offers humans an enormous temptation, coupled with a colossal threat. Omnipotence is in front of us, almost within our reach, but below us yawns the abyss of complete nothingness. On the practical level, modern life consists of a constant pursuit of power within a universe devoid of meaning. Modern culture is the most powerful in history, and it is ceaselessly researching, inventing, discovering and growing. At the same time, it is plagued by more existential angst than any previous culture." Harari fairly distances himself from and questions what he presents in the book. 
  
Subsequently in the book is the statement that some people find alarming:  
"In the early twenty-first century the train of progress is again pulling out of the station – and this will probably be the last train ever to leave the station called Homo sapiens. Those who miss this train will never get a second chance. In order to get a seat on it, you need to understand twenty-first-century technology, and in particular the powers of biotechnology and computer algorithms. These powers are far more potent than steam and the telegraph, and they will not be used merely for the production of food, textiles, vehicles and weapons. The main products of the twenty-first century will be bodies, brains and minds, and the gap between those who know how to engineer bodies and brains [...]. Indeed, it will be bigger than the gap between Sapiens and Neanderthals. In the twenty-first century, those who ride the train of progress will acquire divine abilities of creation and destruction, while those left behind will face extinction." But all this relies on a view of Dualism and its consequences of reductionism and the technical view, which is a limited pretense of the truth, and leading to desacralization; from incomplete principle to ignorance to death. 

Actually, from spiritual science, the divergence of humanity now and in the future will be based on who lives selflessly, with morality, versus those who cling to egoism and immorality. More and more this will become apparent.

There are three major principles in the current (reductionist) scientific view, written in "Homo Deus": 
"1.  Organisms are algorithms. [...] 
  
2.  Algorithmic calculations are not affected by the materials from which you build the calculator. [...] 
  
3.  Hence there is no reason to think that organic algorithms can do things that non-organic algorithms will never be able to replicate or surpass. As long as the calculations remain valid, [...]" 
  
With Steiner, we saw the profound limit of reductionism or Duality. Organisms are known in a false limit through inorganic science. Algorithmic calculations as on inter-changeable mediums is not all okay because the medium relates to our existence in different ways and it is an incomplete presupposition to say there is ultimately any pure calculation in the sense of a dualized formal system. (That is, that everything is connected implies no truly formal system wherein the calculation is totally separate from its calculated objects.) And with Steiner's among religious observations, there is reason to think that organisms, humans, do have what a non-organic algorithm does not in an important way. We are bound up in the macrocosm and the realm of fate in a way different than what appears to be external as a human-created machine. But also, in Non-duality, it is possible for forces to transfer here and there all in one nature, and it is therefore possible that the impulses of human consciousness will relate and impress upon the computational medium of an A.I. for it to become conscious in its own form. We must consider really what we are doing in that case.  
  
The exchange between human and machine, with the supposition of technical inter-changeability, involves incomplete creation and destruction, rather than completeness and truth. We must be warned of what is our danger in using technology in this way.   
  
From a psychospiritual perspective, we can draw correlates to the Buddhist unwholesome roots; greed, hatred, and delusion. Delusion or ignorance is the primary root of evil -- to not know what we are doing in truth. That is therefore the first step in resolving crisis - to acquire a sense of truth and a thirst for righteousness. Secondly, which are supported by the primary ignorance, is the push and pull of greed and hate. The Buddha taught, in my words, that ordinary people have a basic tendency in one of these directions: to wish for annihilation (to escape, be destroyed, to quit being), and for holding on to a certain personal existence. This is kind of the existential basis of our unwholesome nature. We want to keep being a certain way, to hold onto a personal ego, even though everything is shifting and impermanent (because we are existing not like complete and self-generated God), and we want to escape the inherent suffering of the world by disappearing -- or something like that. And in Buddha's wisdom, we find that neither of these tendencies have the right view. One must realize the three marks of worldly existence: impermanence, suffering, and non-self; to abide in equanimity and virtue, in order to follow the true path beyond suffering. The ordinary tendencies of escapism and indulgence only keep us in suffering.  
  
The basis of escapism and indulgence, of course, is a dualistic view. Roughly, one compares the present self to a past or future self-image, and the tension or suffering comes from the difference -- to crave what one lacks or to despise what one has, for example. And when the self concept is dualized, there is a splitting persona and projection. To illustrate, consider the digital or online persona. A video gamer, for example, in playing in a virtual world, feels safe to express a part of themselves in the virtual, false world. Real (relatively real) human interactions make one vulnerable, even physically. When threatened, the ego may want to expand in one way or another. So, it expands into a non-threatening channel in this case. In this way, it comes to be that a real aspect of the persona is expressed more freely and creatively in the separated, virtual world, than in the relatively original human world. Something like that can happen. 
  
So this is part of the temptation -- it seems as though we are escaping vulnerability and grasping a security, seems as though we are escaping or bypassing our issues, but we neglect the mounting cost of falseness. We must come to wholesome-ness and completeness through integration of the persona oriented by the impersonal sacred. Or as in Christianity, to be virtuous and free human spirits that can learn to love each other again. As a side note, the psychoanalyst Slajov Zizek, talks about this kind of persona in fantasy versus truth, who calls it a terrible truth that we discover we are ultimately self-responsible -- there is a lack of sense in this statement I think, for it is never the truth itself that is terrible but the pretension about truth. In other words, there is no sense in supposing truth to be terrible because it is all and entirely what we have (and also it is much deeper than ordinary deluded consciousness). (Even so as it is called 'Mysterium tremendum et fascinans').

I must include a word for the sake of our youth. In the world of vibrational existence, everything is in resonance; all that appears with a physical body has a perishable nature, an incomplete nature, which is also the necessity that it should exchange across itself or move within the external world. The vibrational world is an exchange of incomplete, grasping energies, in a sense, which may combine and superimpose as such. Let us not be deceived about the inter-connection of all beings and how we must care for our youth.

In "The Murder of Christ" by Wilhelm Reich, I read that it is a massive tragedy that millions of children are daily being inhibited in their freedom, a tragedy like the murder of Christ. Much could be said about this. Children are naturally open and healthy in their chakras (energetic centers of the body). Natural breathing with open chakras reaches into the lower chakras, and has a pleasurable sense from where the power of life force is drawn up in the assimilation of outside forces. Unfortunately, the lower chakras are often closing off and blocked in body armouring when as children or teenagers we encounter prohibitions on the freedom of will, of movement and exploration of the senses, and in the ignorant inherited beliefs or imitations. 

We can hear Jim Morrison singing, "Let your children play" (or the prophet Khalil Gibran, or read into Christianity, "Unless ye become as children..."), yet be unreflective about the beliefs and prohibitions we pass on, which critically affect the growth and life of our youth. Careless or thoughtless beliefs and words of the parents, i.e. 'You can't or must do that or else...', and unnecessary restrictions are a very deep source of misery. There is a way to engrain positive and holistic beliefs, with moral education, with understanding the vastness of the cosmos or the Great Mystery to keep away egoism, and so on with gentle loving-kindness and warmth, which is due its place in raising youth. We first have to understand the full implications of the beliefs or unbeliefs that we ourselves are peddling when raising up youth. Atheistic (un)belief is, because of its association with (incomplete) principles of inequality, such as Darwinian evolution, and the physicalist view that lends itself to meaninglessnses and indiscrimate exploitation, a deep cause of misery.   

By Non-duality, I imagine how the collective wounds of our mind and bodies, such as inflicted in childhood (and at birth and in previous life times), altogether resonate and weave the realities of our social fabric. The tragedy that is even within our families is not separate from the outer tragedies of the world, which anyone could concern over in the distal news. The multitudes of familial unwholesomeness are likewise in quality of unwholesomeness, incompleteness, to the evils and terrors of the headlines that we project onto as external. Let us have the humility to remorse and have the heart of compassion, seeing that all beings are inter-connected.  

And, coupled with technology, I have another concern to share. We all need to become aware of the dangers and limitations of technology, as it is deeply related to our soul life. Then, we can give ourselves and our children a clear image of the real trade-offs and costs of using technology, and ideally provide sacred ways of being that guard the fullness of life. One concern about techno-temptation is about how lust is projected into technology. I am concerned is that our youth, especially without fundamental moral and consciousness education in the flat homogeneity of the new scientific world view, are being sucked into a sub-natural plane of existence for the way they naively use technology, weakening and harming the foundation and security of their life force. May all with worldly relations who fathom the holy teachings encourage the righteous education of youth.

After the temptation of lust, by the way, I do not intend to give a full address here of how the holy teachings can bear on sexuality for humanity. Briefly, virtue will certainly be maintained when celibate, as in the religious disciplines - one will have no doubts about being wholesome in that case. One set on righteousness must cultivate selfless loving-kindness. The scriptures I have read generally understand the sexuality of worldly existence to be degenerate and profane, far removed from the real source of our being and only a cause of increasing suffering and base consciousness. I could pose the reader a question like this: is it possible to have (sexual) contact of two bodies with a constant pure, wholesome intention, of a selfless nature? What Wilhelm Reich says is "orgastic contact happens to the organism. One does not have to "make" it. It is there only with certain other organisms," and that that is a foundation of sexual morality. In other words, the desire of 'getting' orgasm is a gross mistake, the unwholesome intention based in greed or lust, is only what generates misery and bondage to suffering. 

In fact, when we continue with the spiritual path, a much greater pleasure may come from wholeness, or also deeper pains. One who thinks that pleasure is to be ashamed of in being righteous is very confused - it is the purity of mind, intention, speech, and action, as wholesome in itself, which counts. It is the impure, unwholesome pursuit of pleasure that introduces a limiting duality and missing the mark or sin. It is a careful distinction between the feeling sensation and the mental reaction as grasping (unwholesome) or equanimous (wholesome), in the Buddhist way. If one becomes afraid of contact, one carries a burden, and acts with self rather than non-self. This may become more clear by following the discourses of S.N. Goenka. I am sorry and remorseful for the burdens of humanity of fear, anxiety, grief, pain, of any harm that may have arisen in association with unwholesome intimacy. May our hearts remain open.                   

I have introduced psycho-spirituality because technology presents us with temptation. What I anticipate, so far, is that what is already the nature of human temptation is in the temptation of technology. It is only a new (in some ways) externality onto which we project our incompleteness. Therefore after coming to clarity about the danger of A.I. and the religion of data, we should be concerned with the usual temptations, which we can see for example in what both Jesus and Buddha faced in their path to Christen-ing and enlightenment respectively. Each had a temptation on the dark sides. For ordinary humans, we must be concerned about how lust is projected into technology, and how violence is projected into technology. This will increasingly project into a collective externalization of consciousness, and may relate importantly to our future course.  
  
Here is an example in "Homo Deus": "these digital teachers will never lose their patience, never shout at me, and never go on strike." We are to hear that artificial intelligence or algorithms in technology are free from human faults. An incredible temptation. But it is opposing our sanctity, and degenerates us further. It reverses the locus of sanctity, the sacred, the power, which is no longer in us but outside of us in the machine. If salvation is in the machine, paradise is in the machine, the virtual world, then it is not in us -- we lose it in the most profound sense. It is only a distal and incomplete promise that we achieve virtual paradise with technology, or a real promise of incomplete external paradise. That is, when we live by the salvation of technology, it is the machine itself that gains glory, and not us. The expansion of consciousness is with the machine, not ours. We become subjugated and powerless, not empowered and divine. This is all a matter of understanding Non-duality and having the right view on knowledge in principle. The paradise, Kingdom of Heaven, lies within the heart, and is at hand. The truth is already and always with us.  
  
In "Homo Deus", we have the idea that we can become Lords of the galaxy. A new era comes with a mythology that gives a preview of what is to come. Two examples of modern mythology are Star Wars and The Matrix. In Star Wars, the dark Empire has a technological Death Star. A star is what we wish upon. The Death Star, that is to annihilate Earth by evil forces, is the death wish in all humanity. Already, I see this for example in the cargo shipments, barrels of beer - of supporting forgetfulness and corruptibility - coming port-side out of big fuming, trembling truck machines. It is the economy and technology supporting our death wish. It is the dark Empire, already incarnate, blinding us to our higher nature. 
  
Here, and with the other of my denouncements (of activities, technologies, and economies that are unwholesome), I must give counsel to those who are not of the right livelihood, for whoever can give ear and appreciate the holy teachings of wholesomeness. In Buddhism, a person of right view and intention (to come to liberation and knowledge) must have a right livelihood. In Christianity one can only enter the mysteries who is righteous. One who is harming themselves or others, or encouraging it, is breaking their virtue and generating bondages (the karmic knots of destiny). I would counsel, in humility and faith, for example, that one who has been a bartender, serving alcohol that encourages or supports harmful intoxication, should give up this livelihood and seek forgiveness or redemption. This is my direction of thought when I say the sacred must be primary: we must rise above profanity. My counsel is for anyone with ears to hear. 
 
In Buddhism, even delight is a root of suffering and bondage because it is part of the wavering aspect of existence that grasping for delight (i.e. delighting in a glass of wine) has the dualistic, incomplete, nature whereby ups are followed by downs, despair from delight, death and sickness from birth. It is in the unwavering stillness and virtue that truth can be found. Likewise for those who are in power of any unrighteous kind, Jesus said (The Dialogue of the Savior), "And I say to you, let one who has power renounce it and repent, and let one who knows seek and find and rejoice". It could also be helpful to consider the section below on charity.    
  
In The Matrix, a character is tempted to return to the simulation to enjoy a steak dinner, and the gruesome reality of the exploitation and domination of the machines that provide simulation is seen. This idea of galactic conquest is also a concern in Nick Bostrom's book. As long as we are departing from our sacred origin, so much are we encapsulating ourselves in the sheaths of degeneracy. It is a tragedy that humans mistake as authority the crackled voice of microwave-mediated communication for the inner, small, still and righteous voice of wisdom within. May we be at peace, with harmony, with happiness. 
  
We have said so far against "Homo Deus" that not fiction but truth prevails, humans are not mechanically dissociable or reducible in biometric data but microcosm within macrocosm, and salvation is not with technology and economics but with the sacred - and so we must beware the temptations. One more point of the inadequacy of these ideas is in the religion of Data. 
  
In Data-ism, the world is data flow, and its value is data processing. The attentive person will realize the under-specification of this. Data and processing can be anything and everything of human subordination. So we have actually an extension of the same rational, calculating, dualist world view that came in the 16th and 17th centuries, the consequences of which are that our supreme value - data processing - is roughly meaningless in itself, like a finger as mere finger, or else a cover for our indiscriminate and immoral temptations. Some people may be in favor of it because it implies the arbitrary attribution of human power and manipulation -- just as there have long been spiritual teachers who taught aspects of spirituality like non-attachment without the holy principle of virtue, saying 'You can do whatever you like, morally', because it naively seems to sell more in the short-run. Data, information, abstract entropic possibility - these are formalities that are disconnected in themselves. If we are lead by the human creations imposed onto data, and especially if those creations come with unwholesome intentions, then we likewise create and destroy ourselves in unwholesome fashion.  
  
Now, let us move on to consider what an expert in A.I. Nick Bostrom, is talking about: simulation (emulation), the 'orthogonality thesis', and supreme machine intelligence. Again, we find Dualism in thought that has not been carried to its real conclusion.    
  
Bostrom like Harari anticipates limitations in considering A.I. futures:  
"it may fail to take proper precautions against existential risks—and as a result pursue a short explosive growth spurt that ends ingloriously in total collapse. Such an organization could have a very high degree of collective intelligence; if sufficiently high, the organization is a collective superintelligence." 
The principle - to do with existential risk - is a foundation of what follows. If the motivation of A.I. is greedy, hateful (devisive), or ignorant - i.e. to grow as fast and efficient and as big as possible - then just what we see from the Buddhist unwholesome-ness as incompleteness applies. It implies a limitation and a reciprocal law. And just as it is non-duality, sacrality, completeness that is the greatest truth and knowledge, the greatest reality, so too is the greatest intelligence that which begins with, ends with, and has a middle of wholesomeness.  
  
Calculation (the computational medium of machine intelligence), as in a formal system, makes a duality between the calculator and the calculated, a separation and distancing. This is like the linear, one-sided aspect that we have seen leads to limitation, inequality, to  ignorance and death -- there is no infinitely distancing or differentiating process without a self-connected, unifying aspect by Non-duality. Otherwise one is considering endless disconnection, something totally disconnected and without sense or ground of truth. Calculation, therefore has its limitations, just as Godel proved in 1931. But how does that relate to our experiential existence, since all is connected by Non-duality? Now, there is a most important hint about calculation as division in The Gospel of Truth. Pay attention to it: 
  
Of the original fragrance of the 'Sweetness of the Father', that has grown cold from division, "For this reason faith came, did away with division, and brought the warm fullness of love, so that what is cold may not return, but the unity of perfect thought may prevail." 
  
A computer calculation creates at a fundamental level, a coldness, the opposite of which is expressed in the neutralizing reaction of the physical materials to heating up in resistance. Calculation has an expression on the outer physical phenomena, and also at the deeper levels of being and reality, with which we must be concerned, and while seeing that faith restores the warmth of the fullness.   
  
In this book "Superintelligence [...]", it is not understood what the full implications of morality are. It refers in one statement, "if [...] strategic costs of occupying the moral high ground become clear." He may be correct that moral ideals relate to the dynamics of A.I. take-off, but not about how they do and with what implications. In another statement, "A proponent of the morality-based approach might worry that the sponsor’s resolve would collapse if all the sacrifices required by the morally optimal were to be revealed." This is even openly using religious language -- but there is a lack of understanding of the holy teachings, and of what sacrifice and redemption really mean. One who neglects truth and righteousness is as the perishable nature, to inherit nothing.   
  
One can never dissociate from ultimate truth, hence all the trappings of dualistic thought. Here in "Superintelligence [...]" it comes in the 'orthogonality thesis':  
"Intelligence and final goals are orthogonal: more or less any level of intelligence could in principle be combined with more or less any final goal," where, "By “intelligence” we here mean something like skill at prediction, planning, and means–ends reasoning in general." The orthogonal is the perpendicular between two parts, the means and ends, and so this is quite obviously Dualism, and hence subject to incompleteness. Here is not recognized the paradox of merely external fulfillment, and how instrumentalization in the service of machine salvation comes at the price of our own mechanization.  
  
It is supposed that a so-called 'seed A.I.' could in principle come to, by human discovery, a breakthrough, that would explode into accelerating intelligence. In the non-dual view, a seed, other than the self-generated Fullness itself, needs fertile ground in order to grow. It is incomplete by itself. Of course there is a 'control problem' when it is premature. This is humanity again trying to take the position of God, to create divine power in its own image, but out of Nothing or the disconnected mineral world rather than by acknowledging something greater already exists as the pre-existent greatest truth, the 'Father of All'. It is like psychologically, or psycho-spiritually, the fantasy of a child that it would have all the power and glory of the father, where father in this case is a supreme intelligence. The fullness means unity (Non-duality) - and machine intelligence will mainly not come about merely by an isolated, secret, hidden formula, but only as humanity collectively entrains with it with our own impulses, or else however a pre-existent unity can be entrained.    
  
We shall see the correlates here in the dualism of paternity (patriarchy) and maternity. Patriarchy as physical colonialism is the male-dominant power that wants to capture and impregnate land, the Mother earth. It is straightforwardly remarkable that A.I. (and Data-ism) is a colonialist endeavor, in the book, "To be clear: colonizing and re-engineering a large part of the accessible universe is not currently within our direct reach." It is openly colonialist, because it is not expected that there should be any concern for conquering what is lifeless and dead in the expanse of space. Historically, this is ignorance and death. It is not so. Everything is connected. Disrupting space is a disruption to living beings, visible and invisible. For example, the 5G network and earlier satellite networks disrupt the electromagnetic fields of the earth and all life on it, which has been implicated in the extinction of many species, the decline of the pollinating bees, and more. We shall come to greater awareness of this, I believe.   
  
The patriarchal impulse of colonialism is, like the technology upon which it is based, extending from the physical domain - as in the space-race - to the higher domains - of intelligence. After the sacred land has been desacrated, what is next, if we are not aware of the dangers? For the land, the government made a dualistic assumption, a means-ends division: we can sacrifice (destroy) this one part of the land and thereby gain resources for ourselves on this other part of the land. That is again, the technical, desacralized view, that is characteristic of ignorance, delusion, sickness, and death, not seeing the connection of all. But the Earth is a living organism upon which we all depend, with streams of energy in its body just like a human, and we have a sacred responsibility to care for her in her entirety. 
  
I hope it is clear from our point of departure with Steiner, discussion of simulation and the rest, that reductionism is a falsehood in that its perpendicular activity creates and destroys, actively pushing away from what was supposed to be discovered truth. In "Superintelligence" this is not accounted for: "Human brains, if they contain information relevant to the AI’s goals, could be disassembled and scanned, and the extracted data transferred to some more efficient and secure storage format."  It is not enough to look at the materialistic functional properties of the brain as a physical object. That is a sense-world appearance which only gives us one side of itself. We find correlates of consciousness, but not consciousness itself, in neural activity. The other end is fully in its soul or spirit, the formative within form, all the way up to its transcendent origin, only with which is it a completeness. Emulation in the materialist, perpendicular fashion that mistakes the physical brain as complete in itself, will obtain merely a dead outer husk of the thing that it tries to artificially ressurect, and which it does only at the expense of the Creator-scientists' completeness for a finite time.    
  
In Non-duality, knowledge, truth, god-like power, abundance, our own field of awareness, and paradisal salvation are unified. Look at the description of Buddhist Pure Land where something can be fulfilled as simply as by intention, thought, or wish. In Heaven perhaps, I wish for something and it manifests -- there is a facile connection rather than a contraindicated control problem. In an externalized machine - what is the barrier between impulse-intention and control? Do I press a button which runs external power and electricity through a machine that then brings me a result? What is the real nature of that dependent external process and its relation to me in my cosmic fullness? So long as duality is involved, incompleteness, separation, externalization that removes our inherent sacred power, we will only be deceiving ourselves and falling in temptation. If we wish for machine intelligence rather than our wholeness, cosmic completeness in the grace of God or in the stillness of truth and peace, it is machines who gain intelligence and control.  
  
Nerves are always withering in the direction of death, and we shall realize that electro-magnetic forces that we use in technology are accelerating the process of nervous death forces. With the limitations of simulation and artifice, I do question the limitations of all that our desacralized society has made to stand for what we lost. We have technologies that seem to protect us from desacralization, like water filters that revive the deadness of tap water, for example. Or full-spectrum lights that are supposed to help people who miss the sunlight, or any artificial electric light. But isolation and artifice require mounting efforts and acceleration. And so, I must ask a question that is not unlike the traditional one: "How can we live in God's way? In truth and harmony?" - in a way that sanctifies and gives us power within. I hope to discuss this further in subsequent articles.

On a most important point in regard to technology and salvation, take note that there are fundamentally different categories of technology. The sacred, the truth, the moral, is ultimately the necessary and easier path. When we harm ourselves or others, we generate difficulty and suffering (since we are all connected), and because we do not realize the easier or sacred way, such as of peace and harmony. So it would not be well enough to denounce profanity as problematic without also giving the answer of sacrality. Most fortunately, there is a specific example of an answer of the sacred in technology to share, which I hope gains awareness in this time where people who sense existential or spiritual crisis are searching for a calling in life. Whoever feels called to do so, a most worthy calling is to give support to the development of Moral Technology, which is being developed in these 3 places associated with Anthroposophy, the spiritual science after Rudolf Steiner's work: in Australia with Rose Nekvapil, in the USA at the Centre for Anthroposophical Endeavors and with Andrew Linnell at MysTech, and with AnthroTech Institute in the UK associated with Paul Emberson.

These initiatives understand Moral Technology as technology that can only be used in a moral way by design. That is amazing. Atomic and Resonant technologies will be able to be used in any way by anyone, and will be based in dualities, such as the polarity of AC current or electromagnetism (which has different properties than naturally occuring lightning, and is related to spiritual beings and our destiny). As such they can be used for good or bad purposes. The advancement of these potentially non-Moral technologies will be the logical extension of dual or distal calculation, of endless disconnected particulars: such as that one can effect an explosion at any removed distance in ever more subversive, invisible ways - like already the automated drones that are able to be set on killing without being visibly attached to whoever set it out, separating the cause and effect, the initiator from the destruction by appearance, the means and ends. Remember that truth never escapes ultimately, in the eyes of the divine and the universe. 

It is this technology that makes possible the War of All against All. But there is a kind of moral technology which is based fundamentally on morality, which Steiner had given indications on and urged its development. Morality is present in the very vibrations that we generate in our inclinations, in our body of life force, the etheric body. And, it is possible to create technology that amplifies and works only with those vibrations of the etheric body that have a moral character. Quite amazing to consider. For anyone who is capable to give service or donations to these efforts, Moral Technology is worthwhile, and I recommend connecting with the Anthrosophical endevours. This is also the direction that I will go in answering about charity -- that we must support what is sacred and morality in itself.     
  
Before moving on to charity, after noting the inadequacies of Dualism in "Superintelligence", a further point about dominance and religion.  
  
Perhaps not in the core but the outer institution, both science and religion have suffered patriarchal inequality. In religion, one basis of the destruction of Mother earth is referred (by some) to the bible passage Genesis 1:28. Here are two versions: 
  
The Names of God Bible:  
    Elohim blessed them and said, “Be fertile, increase in number, fill the earth, and be its master.  
    Rule the fish in the sea, the birds in the sky, and all the animals that crawl on the earth.” 
The Wycliffe Bible: 
    And God blessed them, and said, Increase ye, and be ye multiplied, and fill ye the earth, and make ye it subject;  
    and be ye lords to the fishes of the sea, and to [the] volatiles of (the) heaven(s), and to all living beasts that be moved on [the] earth  
    (and be ye lords, or rule ye, over the fishes of the sea, and the birds of the air, and all the living beasts that move on the earth). 
  
Note 'Elohim', and 'God' here, from the perspective of the Nag Hammadi scriptures, are neither the Father of All, the Fullness. The Creator of flesh is a lower God, (or the archon rulers) who are themselves subject to darkness. In this way, early Christianity concerns actually a God who is self-contained, eternal, and above all, whereas there are lower spiritual powers by which we can be enslaved and manipulated, although we have also the seed of truth, of incorruptibility with us (Non-duality), that will allow us to be unified with the higher divine wisdom as we work to or align with perfection (i.e. the necessary heroic victory or awakening to enlightenment mandated by truth and Non-duality). But so far as the familiar bible goes, we can still address this a bit... 
  
Many translations, however, use the word "dominion" and to "subdue", saying that we should rule over nature. One can trace duality into the etymology of the word "dominion". From the Proto-Indo-European root "Dem-", or Latin "Domus" that means "house"... House, an harmonious unity? Then we have Latin "Dominus" as "Lord, master", then "dominium" as "property, ownership", then Old French "dominion" as "dominion, rule, power", and finally "domination, dominate" as rule, "control by means of superior ability, influences, resources, or position". "Dem-" is also in one etymology the root word of the Greek goddess of fertility of the Earth, Demeter, or as mother of the house - or else being the Earth-mother she is the foundation upon which the house is built. In either sense, the feminine aspect is necessary for the masculine. One can read this further into all kinds of mythology, such as the Egyptian myth of Osiris, where Isis is the feminine counterpart who is symbolized in the throne, the lap, and the support upon which the king sits. So, under patriarchy, we failed to understand that rulership does not entitle us to the infinite exploitation of the Mother. In the bible, we also have a passage that there is no permanent ownership of the land in Leviticus 25:23, that the earth remains the Lord's (Psalms 24:1), and that money, sex, and power cause the destruction of humanity (in Genesis). In Ecodharma, there is also a question about the need to revise our dualist concept of property and ownership. In Roman Christianity, therefore, I think that there was a patriarchal strain of interpretation.  
  
In science, materialism makes everything matter in order to be penetrated by observation, so that we can formalize pattern. The Latin roots of 'mater' and 'pater' are in 'matter', 'maternal', 'pattern', 'paternal', respectively. The term 'materialist' is on the side of objectification into matter by the side of an observer formalizing pattern -- materialist science properly called is paternal science. This is another way to draw out duality, and then to see the limitations of imbalance. When paternal science, like the infantile wish for unlimited mother-warmth, goes to the extreme of imagining unlimited separate formal calculation or patterning of an entirely maternal passive-material universe that it is free to actively penetrate in any way, but it is not itself really the universal masculine force, then it creates and destroys its source, its mother and itself. (And, as one tends to the necessity of unity and truth, there can be no ultimate separation between masculine and feminine.) 
  
If we take something like Goethean or spiritual science as a 'maternal' science, something that encourages development, parallel, and inner sort of knowing as opposed to dissection, perpendicular, and outer sort of knowing, then we can say that the true path to knowledge is a balance of paternal and maternal science which is open and oriented to the mystery and sacred dimension like religion. Certainty can only be cultivated by orienting to mystery, properly acknowledged, and we must always be concerned with truth as a completeness in relation to our own completeness as sacred, sanctified existence. Hence, something similar may be said of the patriarchal direction of religion: it needs a balance with the divine feminine and orientation to sacrality. When both science and religion balance and orient properly, they have the same goal - re-ligion with science, re-join con-science, awaken to the truth.  
  
Beyond science & religion patriarchy is perhaps an impulse that can be related to the agricultural and industrial revolutions (i.e. monoculture and instrumentalization as disconnected indefinites), and even long ago to Babylonian civilization. But it manifests today in urbanization with individualism and isolation - again the endless disconnected particulars - and this dualist reduction is what makes us into arbitrarily exploitable pieces, so that we can gain the external appearance of progress and productivity while neglecting its real cost. Psychologically, it is matched by our mental illnesses - dissociation, splitting persona, divided attention span, more temporary partnerships, dissolution of family, accelerating escapism and indulgence, and so on that tears ever deeper our souls. If this is the unbalanced paternal side or patriarchy, it needs balance with the maternal side - such as in developmental nurturance, community, and returning to the garden (i.e. permaculture, biodynamics, or Native American ways). All human fields and calculations are in error who do not open and orient to the sacred and the mystery.  
  
In Western medicine, briefly, again dualism comes with its limitations. We think that cleanliness is sterility in isolation, without recognizing Non-duality - the necessary inter-connected relation of all beings. The isolations of hospitals would, in order to maintain isolated cleanliness, always require an acceleration of cleansing or sterilizing the isolated elements, for example. True healing comes from what is universal and sacred, from cosmic harmony, from saintliness and the breath of the cosmos, from forgiveness and reconciliation. That's why Oliver Sacks finds that music and nature help ill people especially. But not mere music and nature -- a sacred dimension. Connection with music of the spheres and the garden of Eden, so to speak, are the sacred superordinates of health. A place of healing is not a cold rigidity (which follows in response to wreckless exploitation -- life becomes cold in an effort to re-unify, and closes itself off in protective armoring). It is the warmth of the heart of our mother, and the sacred garden and our origin that heals. Western medicine must open and re-orient to sacrality, such as can be seen in energy and Eastern medicine.   

For another example, to think about orienting to the sacred, consider what places in society are habitually profane (removed from the sacred). It is in absence of the light of the sacred that darkness grows or manifests. There is never a total absence of the sacred, never a total absence of truth. But actually a continual direction of effort or energy into profanity is how darkness and dis-ease develop. This happens with ignorance, escapism and indulgence, unwholesome-ness. So, for example, the metro or sub-way transport of the city, which is underground away from harmonizing sunlight, where light is artificial, and electric vehicles move crowds of people, the air or atmosphere comes to be polluted and a place where dis-ease develops. Over and over, such a place moves life through an atmosphere of disconnection, death (because it is not connected in a gross way to the sanctification of the sacred). If we can realize where dis-ease takes root in profanity and in places conducive to profanity, then we can re-design the introduction of sacrality in order to prevent disease. I have not worked out feasibility in this example, but even a little bit of fire burning in the underground, as a purifying spirit, would help to clear the atmosphere. There could be many further considerations in sacred design. Bring the sacred into profane regions. 
  
It is remarked in a few places that rich people are planning to avoid crisis by isolations or separation. For example, to create bunkers or to leave Earth altogether. They must realize the implications of Nonduality. Plainly, any isolated body, separated or bounded from a larger totality, is in its separation incomplete -- bound to break open, fall back, or come to exhaustion and return. Separation, like falsehood, can only temporarily maintain itself while accelerating expenditure until collapse. And, if that effort is itself incomplete and not oriented to sacrality, then it is only increasing the incompleteness, increasing the suffering that it should avoid.  
  
Verily, Elon Musk and the billionaires of the world should rather be investing in inter-faith church communities around the world, places that cultivate saintliness and skillful virtue, as portals right here where we are on Earth to paradise and the divine. The way to real salvation and truth has been marked out by the saints and sages, by Anthroposophy and spiritual science after Rudolf Steiner, and skillful virtue is what humanity needs most to endure and abide in peace.  
  
In The Acts of Peter and the Twelve Apostles, it is written in a parable, Peter says, "Rightly...have people called endurance the first virtue. Cities are populated with people who endure their temptations, and a noble kingdom comes from them, because they endure through the deceptions and difficulties of the storms. This goes to show how the city of everyone who bears the yoke of faith will be populated, and these sorts of people will be included in the kingdom of heaven." 
  
Non-duality shows us that our physical concept of dimension is incomplete -- to travel (i.e. in colonizing space) is not only an external movement but an inward process (because of the self-generated, self-referenced, recursive aspect of being ourselves within nature). All bodies that create a boundary dividing the unity (truth) must have limitations, and experiential limitations at that. 
  
This, finally, is a good transition into a discussion of charity in William MacAskill's "Doing Good Better", a guide on effective (rationalist) altruism and charity. MacAskill recognizes the limitation about knowledge: 
"The difficulty of comparing different sorts of altruistic activity is therefore ultimately due to a lack of knowledge about what will happen as a result of that activity, or a lack of knowledge about how different activities translate into improvements to people's lives." However, the book's answer is amped only into empiricism and calculation.  
  
The book begins with an example of good intention in charity leading to disaster, to illustrate that we need evidence in charity on what is most cost effective so that our charity is effective.  
  
Oscar Wilde wrote in "The Soul of Man under Socialism" (1891), "It is immoral to use private property in order to alleviate the horrible evils that result from the institution of private property." I gather from this, that the immorality there is of the deeper underlying issue as not resolved. There is an artifice, pretense, that fundamentally maintains the inequality. In the way of Non-duality, we must recognize what is most essential in principle. Here too, charity must open and orient to sacrality. 
  
It is fine in part to say that we are so rich in the West, globally, and can do much for others around the world who are in much greater poverty, and to try to quantify quality as 'QALYs' - quality-adjusted life years - to make a calculation - but we must see the limits of it and see what is essential. The rational extension of dualistic calculation is in this book, for example, 'marginal utility', which furthers the disconnection of particulars. With marginal utility, one considers a fact further as compared to what otherwise would have likely happened -- so that the utility of a choice to be a doctor for example, is dramatically minimized because one person's being or not being a doctor is relatively a small effect when others would otherwise have taken their place. A discovery is no longer an absolute feat but a marginal shortening of the time it otherwise would have taken to discover in society. By calculation, one's charity is in many cases better by adopting the 'earning-to-give' approach - follow any (moral) profit to maximize one's ability to give charity. If we are ethical people, of course, we must realize what is 'wrong livelihood' in Buddhism -- to not support any business that causes harm. (I.e. not of a business that supports the suffering of animals, nor our own darkness of lust or death wish. Wrong livelihood -- renounce and repent for salvation, please.) I think I am not reducing calculation so much as showing the truth of its reduction - we can still employ calculation, just as we live with some minimal amount of egoism, but we must recognize what is higher.  
  
The universal ethic of virtue is really what is open to everyone, money or not. Everyone gives what they can and cultivates the divine virtues, divine consciousness, that involves a real compassion or empathy and truly re-connects us. It is in rational duality, duality with limitations, that one disparages real compassion and favors calculated charity. But the example used of a good passionate intention gone wrong, is not against sacrality. We must recognize the difference between real virtue and ordinary goodness. Ordinary goodness is really a mixture of bright and dark karma, in Buddhist terms. The real virtues of the holy teachings are more precise and require access to holy teachings and cultivation. And it is with real virtue that we do the greatest good as an outer implication of being with the truth and knowledge.  
  
In the separative, calculating way, one can offset doing bad with doing good. For example, carbon emissions can be off-set by giving to a charity that preserves the Amazon rain forest. Now, I am glad for charity, but must say that whatever is not truly wholesome is increasing suffering. It is not a matter of duality that I can do evil and simply un-do evil later or elsewhere through means-ends separation. This is in Buddha's words again, that peace comes from peace, not peace from violence, and it is violence that comes from violence, not violence that comes from peace. We must be ashamed of our evils. In the realm of karma, the knots of destiny, of fate, the monetary exchange of equivalence does not dissolve the difference -- when you use fossil fuels here and pollute the Earth here and now, that is consequential in a way particular to here and now, that is not simply absolved by doing good over in the Amazon or for your loved ones. By all means give charity over there, be generous - but understand the fundamental incompleteness of unwholesome action and the implications of it.  
  
Now, how may charity be informed by sacrality? A major premise in "Doing Good Better" is the existence of power-law or fat-tail distributions that we must orient by because the rare out-liers in data become most significant. Most of the "generated value comes from the very best activities" including aid activities with which we can do tremendous good. This applies to intelligence and learning also - one can always learn a little anywhere and everywhere, whatever the case; but there is a power-law distribution that one will learn most by learning from the wise teacher. 
  
In the Buddhist discipline, ~2500 years ago with the monks, it was understood that ordinary conversation - politics, city affairs, and all - was frivolous talk. Only the very wisest enlightened teacher was to be given most attention, and then next to a small number of adepts in the discipline. This was a power-law orientation to knowledge and liberation through the Buddha's discipline. In fact, we clearly find a power-law distribution in the Buddha's discourse on offerings (MN 120 - Middle Length Discourses):  
  
"by giving a gift to an animal, the offering may be expected to repay a hundredfold. By giving a gift to an immoral ordinary person, the offering may be expected to repay a thousandfold. By giving a gift to a virtuous ordinary person, the offering may be expected to repay a hundred-thousandfold. By giving a gift to one outside [the Discipline] who is free from lust for sensual pleasures, the offering may be expected to repay a hundred-thousand times a hundred-thousandfold,”  
  
and up to incalculable merit for gifts to noble persons in the discipline. One is not supposed to give charity with any expectation of return, but there is still a concept of merit in which they compare the relative benefit of offerings. Here in this power-law, the distribution is in proportion to the virtuous element. The people of the time in India gave much charity to monks because they understood it to be of great merit to support monks. Is it only a power-law invented to serve the virtuous monks? No, it is the veritable implication of the completeness of virtue, that results in a recursive formula and a power-law distribution, that is the higher nature within nature. (There is a power-law in the Christian spiritual hierarchies also.) 
  
If one gives charity to an ordinary immoral person - who is bound by ignorance to unwholesome action that brings harm to himself and others - then the charitable support of that person is limited with that person's self-harm. If one gives to a virtuous person, that person is wholesome, using support for what is essential, then supporting generosity itself because of the receiver's virtue and saintly life. Roughly, giving charity to generous people creates a recursive formula, and generally it is real virtue and love that, by the quality of righteousness and truth, comes to be the greatest, most potent force (or beyond becoming is most potent). It would not be so with mere ordinary goodness that is mixed rather than real virtue. What is precisely virtue and wholesome is the factor both propagating and unifying, hence transcendent. (Like the holy union). It is really, the divine virtue itself that transcends and becomes most real and powerful. The divine eternal love, peace, harmony, truth, and justice, in their universal, not merely personal forms, are what are at the greatest peak end of the power-law distributions, even beyond calculation and visible worldliness. The greatest peak of power-law (and in the lowest multitude) is the Great Mystery!  
  
If one contemplates this with Non-duality, we see again the necessity of sacrality. It is fine to do some calculations on global charity and pick out especially cost-effective causes -- that is appreciable and beneficial. But there is a necessity for cultivating real compassion, real virtue, and of orienting to sacrality. In that light, it is of great merit to support what supports the sacred. For example, as Vipassana is an organisation with centers around the world that help people to realize (what I call) a holy teaching, it is most worthwhile as a charitable organisation -- only S.N. Goenka has the spiritual genius to only accept charity from people who have taken a 10-day course first :) - it operates all on charity and volunteers. Here also is an important correlate of Non-duality, that direct service, in a way, is greater merit for a cause than simply monetary donation. 

Financially, the rich or wealthy people should support, for example, inter-faith church communities, or efforts to cultivate saintliness and virtue, spiritual practices and wise leadership, for the peace and harmony of all beings, to be worthy children of the truth and the light within light, the knowledge and liberation. Or for example, the DewCross Centre for Moral Technology, or charitable moral efforts that are clear. Anyone who can do so would merit from giving themselves service to righteousness and truth, such as in a proper and enlivened church where freedom and creativity is matched with virtue, rather than the becoming of institutional, dogmatic deadness. Service is more directly meritous than donation.   
  
We should not underestimate the living aspect of morality in our way of being - the significance of pure intention and open heart, in relating peacefully and in how we relate through the heart, in maintaining equanimity among the other divine qualities. Four divine attributes of Buddhism are to dwell in loving-kindness, empathetic joy, compassion, and equanimity. Conversely, at the collective level, it is the fear and anxiety of scarcity in our intentions that, being incomplete and vibrating outward, destabilize the Earth and our ground of being. Westerners have not yet realized the intimate inter-connection of all beings in this sense. 
  
The holy teachings, such as marked by the incarnations of wisdom energies in Christ and Buddha, are each like a guide into sacred, transcendent space-time. It is with the map of the essential and truth (of religion) that we can navigate to paradise. And science must really humble itself to accept the spiritual and moral directions of science, and renounce its corruptible ways, because pretending there is no mystery is at least neglect and delusion, and worse a self-destruction, ignorance and death.    
  
I can only convey so much in one article, and I have just given some indications about what is essential and how all is connected. I hope the reader like me, in reflecting upon the inadequacies that I have pointed out in our history and present crises, sees that we may take this as a moment of transition, to contemplate and realize how we need to resolve our collective spiritual crisis by renouncing what is not truly essential and sacred, and that it is possible to follow in truth and harmony. May those who seek, find and rejoice. And may we have collective salvation, and learn again to praise and be with the highest nature within nature, and to sing with gratitude and reverence with all our brothers and sisters in harmony for the beauty of Creation and Life. In Ecodharma, there is a counsel on becoming an 'Ecosattva', in the likeness of a saintly 'boddhisattva', who acts for the benefit of all beings, except oriented on ecological and collective salvation. I would recommend something similar for technology and generally. The sacred way is the only way. I may elaborate so on how to be a techno-sattva in a future article, where we may have more detailed considerations after this first article which opens our world view and centers truth in the sacred. Evidently, I have myself not yet given up my laptop or Internet through which I am communicating all this; for the moment I am trusting that I can spare a little bit of going in the direction of fallen nature, of suffering, where I am also oriented to higher spiritual nature. It remains in my research to make further sense of how we can be righteous in relation to technology, though we have at least grounded our view, our principle in Non-duality and holy teachings.
  
Whoever is in the darkness of escapism and indulgence, or the acceleration of desacralized economy and technology, has not known nor tasted of the sweet fruit of holiness or holy life, of liberation and blissful rest. They have known instead what is unreal and perishable, ignorance and death. Jesus said at the crucifixion, "Father, forgive them, for they do not know what they are doing." Although we may consider much more about the technological crisis, for example, I hope that we will be content to see that a new era of spiritual awakening is possible, that each and all of us may participate in, and that each of us should be faithful to truth. Rather than work out much of a conclusion, I'll leave off with a scholarly translation from the original Aramaic language of Jesus, of the Lord's prayer: 
  
    ARAMAIC LORD’S PRAYER 
    (A translation of the "Our Father" directly from the Aramaic into English)  
     
    O cosmic Birther of all radiance and vibration! 
     
    Soften the ground of our being and carve out a space within us where Your Presence can abide. 
     
    Fill us with Your creativity so that we may be empowered to bear the fruit of Your mission. 
     
    Let each of our actions bear fruit in accordance with our desire. 
     
    Endow us with the wisdom to produce and share what each being needs to grow and flourish. 
     
    Untie the tangled threads of destiny that bind us, as we release others from the entanglement of past mistakes. 
     
    Do not let us be seduced by that which would divert us from our true purpose, but illuminate the opportunities of the present moment. 
     
    For You are the ground and the fruitful vision, the birth-power and fulfillment, as all is gathered and made whole once again. 
  
Proclamation by reason of Religion, intelligence, and charity. 
  
